Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Alex Ioshpe
"Easely one of the worst films of the year.."
With the millenium just around the corner, Hollywood is playing with our
insecurities concerning the biggest event of this century. This time it is
Arnold Schwartzenegger against the powers of evil. The result is somewhat
predictable. I didn't have high hopes about Arnold's "much anticipated"
return to the big screen. Schwarzenegger fans will probably be pleased,
action lovers won't be bored, and the Catholic League will be angry.
Everyone else will see 'End of Days' for what it is: a deliciously bad
motion picture. Think of it as Hollywood's own Y2K bug.
Did you know that if you turn the three diabolical numbers 666 you'll get
999, as in 1999? Yes, you better believe it..Satan is here on earth, working
on his latest project -- the end of days. This time it is Gabriel Burne who
gets the privilege to play Lucifer and, although not Al Pacino, he is fun to
behold. He coolly strolls through Manhattan in the borrowed body of an
investment banker, wreaking, as they say, havoc. The way it works is he
smirks and something explodes. Before the stroke of the new millennium he's
got to find and impregnate a certain woman in order to climb out from under
a heavenly curse as spelled out in the Book of Revelations. Only
Schwarzenegger's cop attached to an anti-terrorist unit can stop him.
Films like this has one serious weakness -- logic. No matter how you twist
the "plot", you'll find it incredibly stupid (even for a Schwartzenegger
movie!). The incredible fact is that such directors never learn. After
thousands of headless productions, this theme has become one big cliché.
Here the Devil looks more like a sex addicted maniac that has just got out
of a mental institution. He is walking around N.Y., blowing everything up
and killing everyone that gets in a 5 meter radius. All he wants is the
girl, that is somehow special. But Schwartzenegger is more clever than he
looks, he has hidden her in a church, where Satan dare not enter. So the
Evil One is forced to seduce the good cop in order to get the valuable
information: "You can have your wife and daughter back..I can give you
happiness that you can only dream of..Just give me the address.." Indeed
with a script like that, you could make a wonderful parody, but
unfortunately the director is taking this subject very seriously, attempting
to create a provoking an dramatic thriller. And for you who have awaited
Arnold Swartzenegger's comeback, will not be very satisfied. We've not seen
him in a while. That's because he didn't have a worthy opponent. He has
battled nuclear terrorists on Earth and power mad conspirators on Mars. He
has taken on alien predators in the darkest reaches of the jungle and
morphing cyberkillers that seemingly nothing can stop. So, after all those
fights, what's left for Arnold Schwarzenegger? How about Satan? In my
opinion, he has never quite overcome his first role as the deadly robot in
Cameron's "Terminator". And that is Schwartzenegger's strength -- muscles
and no emotions. Here he tries to achieve an artistic level, moving towards
the Oscar. This is called "an adult turn" if successful and "a flop" if
unsuccessful. Make a wild guess! His character has lost his wife and
daughter and has serious drinking problems. This requires at least some
acting skills. Regrettably, the only thing convincing about old Arnold is
his muscles.
The rest of the cast are struggling with their so called characters. The
movie is otherwise technically impressive, with a solid cinematography and
fine lighting. But the movie doesn't serve neither as a serious thriller
(because of its stupidity) nor as comic entertainment (because of its
serious tone). The only real comic relief in this film is when Swartzenegger
tries to cry. The action sequences are all recycled and the effects are
everything but spectacular. So I really have a hard time recommending this
film to somebody. Unless you are a die-hard Schwartzenegger fan, stay away.
As for Schwarzenegger, he'll be back.
"END OF DAYS" & ALL RELATED MARKS & MEDIA ARE TM & Š 1999 UNIVERSAL STUDIOS.
THIS SITE IS IN NO WAY AFFILIATED WITH ANY ENTITY INVOLVED IN THE PRODUCTION
OF THE MOVIE. ALL OPINIONS CONTAINED HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE AUTHOR ALONE.
ALL PICTURES AND OTHER MATERIAL WERE OBTAINED THROUGH APPROVED CHANNELS OR
FROM THE PUBLIC DOMAIN AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO INFRINGE ANY COPYRIGHTS.
VISIT THE OFFICIAL SITE: http://www.end-of-days.com

Author
Ross Anthony
Are you charmed by Arnold? (I am) Does a big Hollywood movie with Arnold
sound attractive to you? If so, then "End of Days" fits that bill. Arnold
straps lots of cool weapons to his prize-winning body. Arnold takes bullets
to the chest, baseball bats to the skull and an assortment of other would-be
fatal blows. But Arnold seemingly retains his interminatability (as if it
rubbed off from previous roles under different direction). If that's what
you like -- you'll be happy.
If however, you associate Arnold with smart action a la "Terminator," "True
Lies" etc. you may react as did a fellow in the men's room after the show,
"Disappointed!" he frowned shaking his head as he zipped up. Or the snoozing
gentleman in the row behind me ... after the crashing crescendo of the
climax faded, his steadfast snoring could be heard. Even though I was not as
dismayed as these two, it was obvious that "End of Days" didn't deliver the
powerful immensity we've come to expect from Mr. Schwarzenegger.
Here's the plot ... The millennium on the verge, Satan comes back to Earth
in the form of a man, seeking the woman that's been branded to be the mother
of his son (the antichrist we can assume). The Vatican is well aware of this
prophecy and sends an ugly mob of weapon wielding priests to carve her up.
However, there's a group of "good guy" priests dabbling in stigmata research
and therapy that try to protect the innocent would-be anti-Madonna from
(ahem) Satan's little sword. Arnold, a down and out body guard, stumbles
into this mess and ultimately finds himself defending this freaked out girl
from Lucifer himself.
It's a challenge to pretend that it makes sense to fight the prince of
darkness with traditional Hollywood blow up weaponry. As an arch
enemy/villian/bad guy, this Satan is formidable, but as the devil? He's
rather impotent. Though touched on (especially in a good scene in Arnold's
home), Satan's powers of manipulation were sorely underdeveloped. Also
lacking consistancy, Satan shows off the ability to read Arnold's inner most
thoughts, yet he still needs Arnold to voluntarily verbalize where the girl
is hidden. Lastly, the religious dilemma concerning the murder of an
innocent to save the world could have been realized on the screen with
greater sympathy. Instead, the priests with guns seem to take to thuggery as
if it were second nature.
It's one of those action films where things happen so that the next visual
thing can happen -- not necessarily because the transgression is logical or
developmental. "End of Days" sports some powerfully visual special effects,
but fails to lure you in emotionally or even sympathetically. You're just a
watcher. Another viewer quipped, "The film pulls you through it like a dog
on a leash."
But "End of Days" still displays some shining moments: 1) A scene in which
Satan relieves himself on the sidewalk, then sets his own puddle of urine on
fire. 2) Arnold suspecting his best bud to be the devil, lets a bullet make
the decision. 3) Satan's first shocking deed as a man. 4) The final
appearance of Satan in his "real" bat-winged form.
It's not strong on substance (though it could have been), still, I don't
think you'll have a bad time.
End of Days. Copyright Š 1999. Rated R.
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Kevin Pollack, Robin Tunney,
Cch Pounder, Rod Steiger.
Directed by Peter Hyams.
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe.
Produced by Armyan Bernstein and Bill Borden at Beacon/Univeral.
Grade..........................B
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Peter Hyams.
Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollak, Rod 
Steiger, CCH Pounder, Miriam Margolyes.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 27, 1999.
In Arnold Schwarzegger's very first starring role since 1996's "Eraser" (and 
not counting the embarrassing 1997 debacle "Batman & Robin"), Peter Hyams' 
"End of Days" is, on the one hand, an intelligent film choice, but on the 
other hand, a not-so-good one. In his role as ex-cop Jericho Cane, 
Schwarzenegger has more substance to work with than usual, because he is a 
washed-up, borderline alcoholic still grieving over the untimely murders of 
his wife and daughter. He handles his character well, and for someone who 
oftentimes is criticized for his thespian skills, he believably conveys the 
true loss of loved ones. The problem with "End of Days" isn't Schwarzenegger, 
and it isn't the nifty visual effects, or the other performances. No, the 
source of the dilemma stems squarely from the ham-handed screenplay, by 
Andrew W. Marlowe, which not only lays on the melodrama a little thick in the 
second half, but also wastes much of the opportunity to make a rousing, 
unforgettable, end-of-the-millenium thriller. As New Year's approaches and 
you'd like to check out a movie set on the eve of the 21st-century, rent one 
of the decade's most innovative, underrated films, 1995's "Strange Days."
Opening in NYC, circa 1979, a woman gives birth to a child, which is then 
briefly taken away from her to be involved in a snake sacrifice on the grungy 
basement level of the hospital. It seems this baby has been chosen as the one 
to be impregnated between the hours of 11 o'clock and midnight on December 
31, 1999, thus ending the world. Yes, I'm sure this sounds silly so far, but 
at least a character wisely asks if they mean Eastern Standard Time. Switch 
forward to the final week of the millenium, the baby has grown up to be 
20-year-old Christine York (Robin Tunney), a young woman who unknowingly has 
been hunted down for her whole life, and who has the ability to see things 
that aren't really there--or, at least, things that seem to only be in her 
imagination. Meanwhile, on the other side of the city, a wavery entity makes 
its way into a ritzy restaurant, travels into the bathroom, and enters the 
body of an unidentified businessman (Gabriel Byrne). Of course, we know out 
of common sense that it is the spirit of Satan himself, come to conceive of a 
child with Christine. Enter Jericho and his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak), 
who unwittingly get involved in the satanic plot after investigating a 
mysterious gunman in the hospital, who turned out to be a priest.
Coming to theaters after the similarly religious-themed "Stigmata," "End of 
Days" is a better film, overall, simply because it introduces two 
protagonists (Jericho and Christine) that are at least likable enough to root 
for, unlike the central character in the former picture (played by Patricia 
Arquette), who was a slutty dimwit. Since "End of Days" is supposed to be 
nothing more than an entertaining popcorn movie (which it somewhat succeeds 
at), I can forgive most of its far-fetched nature, but some of it is such 
blatant rubbish that you can't help but snicker. A virtuous priest (Rod 
Steiger, in his first role that calls for him to actually act in years), for 
example, discusses how the number of the Devil, 666, actually means 999 if 
turned around. Add a "1" in front of it and you get 1999. If this is supposed 
to be anything but laughable, religious hogwash, then my first name is Merv.
New Year's Eve in 1999 is such an obviously provocative setting for a film 
that it is an unfortunate shame director Peter Hyams (1997's "The Relic") 
chooses to not put it to any notable use. With an alleged budget of 
$100-million, no one can tell me the filmmakers didn't have enough money to 
really throw caution to the wind and make an action-thriller that is 
something truly special and one-of-a-kind. As is, the only impressive visual 
effects are the effective ripples in the air that signify the Dark Side, and 
the demonic face of Satan that appears in a wave of fire in the otherwise 
cheesy climax.
As proven in "The Relic," Hyams may not be a master of building and 
developing characters, but he sure does know how to set up an action 
sequence, with no more valid example than the one edge-of-your-seat setpiece 
in the second half, which takes place on the subway. Nicely built-up and even 
suspenseful (one moment--the only in the whole movie--really startled me), 
the scene plays itself out to a stirring conclusion.
Gabriel Byrne, seemingly borrowing some of Al Pacino's mannerisms from the 
much-better 1997 horror film, "Devil's Advocate," is exceptionally menacing 
and appropriately cast as the ultimate villain. Byrne, who coincidentally 
portrayed a priest in "Stigmata," is, like in that film, the highlight of the 
cast. No matter what the role, Byrne takes himself, grabs the character 
tightly, and seems to make it his own, as if it was written for no one else.
"End of Days" isn't a bad movie by any means; it's just a reasonably silly 
one that, in one form or the other, has been overdone to death. There are no 
true surprises in the course of the whole film (aside from the aforementioned 
unconvincing and cornball twist at the end), nor does it even attempt to want 
to make any sense. After a sizable hiatus, Schwarzenegger is back in top 
form, but I think it's about time for this "End of Days" to signal the end of 
a well-worn, tiresome subgenre.

Author
Walter Frith
Arnold Schwarzenegger.  An example of how big you can make it in the movies
and then have it fall apart so fast.  In the 90's, Ah-nuld has only had
three good films.  'Total Recall', 'Terminator 2: Judgment Day' and
'Eraser'.  'Last Action Hero' was Arnold's egotistical version of Bruce
Willis' 'Hudson Hawk' and 'True Lies' was both uneven, only mildly funny,
and lacked James Cameron's signature heap of kinetics.  I enjoyed Arnold's
work mildly in the comedies 'Twins' and 'Kindergarten Cop' but not 'Junior'.
Arnold served in the Bush administration in some sort of fitness advisor
capacity.  I forget the official title he carried but George Bush's claim
that he wanted to be a kinder, gentler president prompted Arnie to make his
second terminator portrayal a kinder gentler character.  A humourous
metaphor for his political connections, but let's be honest here, did we
really need a kinder and gentler terminator?  Give me a break!  He takes an
oath in the movie at the insistence of John Connor (Edward Furlong), that he
will not kill anybody.  So let's face it, Leonard Maltin was right when he
said that the first terminator movie was better simply because the film, and
Arnold's character, had much more edge.
Satan.  His image conjures up many things wrong in the world.  He's been
played by many actors.  Jack Nicholson, Al Pacino and even little old George
Burns have played the fallen angel most uniquely.  And now Gabriel Byrne
plays him with an ice cold sinister deviousness.  Byrne is a great actor
whose work in 'Miller's Crossing' and 'The Usual Suspects' remains his best.
He even had a hand in producing one of this decades most emotionally wrought
political dramas, 'In the Name of the Father'.
Both Schwarzenegger and Byrne provide a good and not so obvious game of cat
and mouse in 'End of Days'.  The first thing I should say about this film is
that it has so many plot holes and enough credibility gaps to allow a
transport truck to drive through that you must toss these factors aside if
you truly want to enjoy the picture.  Director Peter Hyams, whose work is
better when he has a hand in writing or co-writing his own scripts has a few
films I really enjoy.  'The Star Chamber' from 1983 where a group of
vigilante judges carry out their own brand of justice.  'Outland' from 1981
with Sean Connery in an outer space version of 'High Noon' and 1979's
'Hanover Street' with Harrison Ford as a World War II pilot having an affair
with a married English woman.
Hyams often acts as his own director of photography and clouds his films in
a murky and charcoal type of atmosphere which are fitting in adding to his
many scenes of compelling structure.  His vision is sometimes repetitive but
he makes fairly decent films.
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe, 'End of Days' is about an ex-cop and present
day high profile security officer (Schwarzenegger) who becomes involved in
confronting Satan when a young woman is chosen to be Satan's concubine who
will bear his child to walk upon the earth in the next millennium.  The film
begins in Vatican City in 1979 where the Pope and his council agree that the
time has come, based on a sign, where a female will be born in the world
that will be the chosen one for Satan's nasty scheme of planting his seed on
Earth.  Around the same time, a baby girl is born in New York City and a
ritual is carried out upon her at the hospital where she's born that will
put her under Satan's spell.  Skip forward 20 years.  1999.  Things begin
coming together on a collision course for the sake of mankind's existence.
A wall street banker (Byrne) goes to the men's room of an NYC restaurant and
is accosted in the men's room by the tangible spirit of Satan to walk the
streets in a man's body.  Satan has planted his disciples in positions of
advantage that will aid him in his plan to have Christine York (Robin
Tunney) bear his child and witness the end of man's days upon the planet.
Jericho Cane (Schwarzenegger) hooks up with the plot when he investigates
and assassin's plan to open fire on the streets of NYC.  He then finds the
writings of a street vagrant in an abandoned underground tunnel way and
connects the writings with quotes from the Bible and locks horns with the
devil in an attempt to protect the forces of good in the film.
Now, in 'The Exorcist' the devil was defeated with two priests being
sacrificed in the process.  Their religious bindings and the word of God
were powerful enough to expel the devil from a little girl's body.  'End of
Days' just doesn't come off as credible.  An observation is made in the film
that only the pure of heart can kill the devil and Cane isn't pure of heart.
He's angry at God for letting his family be taken from him and is a flawed
and truly mortal being whom Satan could squash like a bug if he really
wanted to.  In other films and t.v. shows where the bad guys always let the
good guys hang on just a little too long to defeat them which proves to be
their downfall, well, this is what happens in 'End of Days'.  There are also
scenes of action and excitement that just aren't credible and bring the film
down to an almost laughable capacity.  However, the portrayal of Satan by
Byrne, the special effects and some good camera work redeem the film
somewhat.
What's also funny is some of the humour displayed which are inside jokes
based on 'The Usual Suspects' from 1995.  Arnold's side kick in this film is
Kevin Pollak who appeared as one of the criminals in 'The Usual Suspects'
with Gabriel Byrne.  There is a scene where a trail of flammable fluid is
set a blaze to cause a big explosion, seen in 'The Usual Suspects' and a
line is delivered that says: "The greatest trick the devil ever pulled was
convincing the world he didn't exist".....a classic line uttered by Kevin
Spacey in 'The Usual Suspects'.  'End of Days' can stand fully on its own
and is worth a look by the curious but only die hard Arnold fans will
embrace it as great.  For the rest of us, it's an average ride all the way.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests
to ejohnsonott@prodigy.net or e-mail ejohnsonott-subscribe@onelist.com
with the word "subscribe" in the subject line.
Hollywood never fails to astound me. Every time I think those coked-up
little buggers have hit rock bottom; they come up with a new
excavating tool. I was truly convinced that "Wild Wild West" marked
1999 studio filmmaking at its most hapless, but then along comes "End
of Days" to prove me wrong. This big budget, brain dead apocalyptic
thriller bludgeons its audience with overwrought music, grisly
violence, explosions galore and lots of cheesy special effects. The
result? Nothing but groans and yawns. Even the Devil himself is unable
to produce a decent scare in this festival of the inept. At the very
least, "End of Days" should have done us the courtesy of being
bad-enough-to-be-good, but it can't even manage that. It's just lousy.
Arnold Schwarzenegger, still recovering from heart problems and
"Batman & Robin," plays an ex-cop turned security agent or bodyguard
or something. Along with his obligatory comic relief partner (Kevin
Pollak, impersonating Matthew Perry's Chandler character from
"Friends"), he gets involved in some major league supernatural
hoodoo. It seems that Satan (Gabriel Byrne) gets a shot at world
domination only once every thousand years (and here I thought he'd
pulled it off with the Republican landslide of '94). If he has sex
with 20-year old Christine York (Robin Tunney), "the Chosen One,"
their child will be the Antichrist, or at least a brat.
Ah, but this deal has more catches than a New Year's Eve pass from a
Halfway House. The unholy union must take place on December 31, 1999
(you see, 999 is just 666 turned upside down), but only between 11
p.m. and Midnight (no wonder this guy is so cranky). And if the Chosen
One is given refuge in a church, the devil won't know where she is,
because he can't see into the sanctuary. You know, it's kind of like
Superman's X-ray vision and lead walls, only evil.
A group of guerrilla Catholic priests decide the best way to stop the
situation is by killing the girl. Arnold chooses to save the girl and
kick the hell out of Satan, if you'll pardon the expression. And Kevin
meets up with an exploding van and has to make some decisions of his
own. Oh, the anguish! Oh, the humanity! Oh, the writing!
Andrew W. Marlowe's screenplay ladles implausibility upon
implausibility, from the preposterous otherworldly histrionics to his
handling of Jericho Cane, Schwarzenegger's character. Cane starts the
film a la Mel Gibson in the first "Lethal Weapon," preparing to put a
gun in his mouth due to ongoing despondence over the murder of his
wife and daughter. Twenty minutes later, he's racing through the
bowels of New York City, deciphering clues that Sherlock Holmes and
Kreskin would find baffling.
When Cane meets up with Christine York, he instantly switches to
Terminator father figure mode, with the young woman serving as
surrogate daughter. In case anyone misses the connection, the camera
comes in for a close up of Christine's music box, which just happens
to be identical to one owned by Cane's daughter. Subtle, Marlowe,
subtle.
Speaking of cameras, director Peter Hyams is just the man to take
Marlowe's script and make it even more self-important, murky and
annoying. Hyams' direction shows all the subtlety of a Gwar video,
with Cane running a gauntlet of ridiculous action set pieces,
punctuated with loads of big explosions. Eager to satisfy Arnold's
core audience, he even throws in a few pairs of breasts as well. What
a guy.
Had the film delivered some decent scares, or even maintained a
consistently ominous tone, the bombastic clichés might have been
tolerable, but "End of Days" is simply a flaccid special effects
show. The cast is just as ineffective. In his early scenes, Gabriel
Byrne attempts to invest Beelzebub with some panache, but he all too
soon turns into just another standard issue monster. Kevin Pollak
comes and goes quickly, Robin Tunney comes off like a bargain basement
Winona Ryder and as for Arnold, well  he's a better actor than
Casper Van Dien. That should count for something.
Way back in the aftermath "The Exorcist" and "The Omen," supernatural
swill like "End of Days" might have passed muster as a B-movie. But
that was then and this is now. "The X-Files" and "Buffy the Vampire
Slayer" deliver real scares on a weekly basis and, if we want to see
the Devil, all we have to do is flip on "The 700 Club" and take a
gander at Pat Robertson's grinning maw. After enduring "End of Days,"
all I can say is "Get thee behind me, Satan. And while you're at it,
get thee a better agent as well."

Author
Mac VerStandig
A copy of this review can be found at 
http://moviereviews.org/review_-_end_of_days.htm
End of Days goes up in flames- literally. With both the hereditary flaws 
of an apocalyptic film, poor acting and a lack of that magical quality 
that oftentimes makes unrealistic action movies seem plausible; it is 
most fitting that the title card in the opening credits is on fire.
There are certain liberties which movies like this can take. Over the 
summer Universal, the parent of this work, released Bowfinger, a comedic 
satire which explained that if the action is good, the plot doesn't have 
to make sense. James Cameron knows about this. His Terminator films 
hardly hold their own weight in a world of Jane Austen (incidentally, 
there actually is a Jane Austen film opening opposite this movie) but 
the effects are grade-A and Arnold Shwarzenegger (from here on out known 
as "Arnie") is at his best. Unfortunately, director Peter Hyams doesn't 
have those Cameronian effects and the key performance is Arnie-lite.
After a brief opening stint in 1979's Vatican City and New York City, we 
are taken to the big apple of December 28, 1999. In three days, 1000 
years will be over and Satan has a plan to end all humanity. The end of 
days will require the rape and pregnancy of the chosen one (named 
Christine York and played by Robin Tunney) between the hours of 11:00pm 
and midnight, Eastern Standard Time. The offspring will then come alive 
Rosemary's Baby style and all of existence will be negated. The details 
on how exactly this takeover will occur are omitted (if they ever 
existed in the first place).
Arnie plays a security guard for hire. He takes a bullet for his client 
(actually, the movie uses an old bulletproof vest joke to create the 
false illusion that he is dead, something that clearly can't happen to 
the star only 15 minutes into the movie) and pursues the shooter. The 
man with the gun turns out to be a priest who chose a life of poverty 
over the church. Arnie catches up with him and he mutters an apocalyptic 
phrase before Arnie shoots him. Seem strange yet? It gets more bizarre. 
The guy doesn't have a tongue.
The movie continues in this worn-out chase, kill, chase, kill, etc85 =
format until you are absolutely fed up with apocalyptic mythology. The 
only interesting or original revelation the movie makes is that Simon 
and Garfunkel were right, "the words of the prophets are written on the 
subway walls."  
Somewhere in this tangled plot lies a corrupt police officer, some 
bodies that are taken from the dead, a few explosions, a flying 
helicopter sequence, Latin codes, stigmata and a whole lot of burning 
candles.
There is a basic flaw in films that threaten to end all existence: they 
very rarely do. Most directors are far too frightened to produce a movie 
that ends by telling everyone in the audience that they are dead. On 
occasion, exceptions are made. Recently (SPOILER OF ANOTHER MOVIE 
AHEAD), The Astronaut's Wife used this tactic which raised a few brows 
but hardly cleaned up at the box office.
Not long ago, the Catholic Church got in an uproar over the release of 
Dogma, another film that used the bible and some astray theories to 
threaten a negation of existence. End of Days takes it all even further 
with gun toting priests, ritual birth ceremonies with snake's blood and 
a massive shootout in a church. It remains a mystery as to why the 
church didn't get upset over this production.
The movie does have some other problems. Satan is a far too agreeable 
character. At one point many viewers may actually root for him. As in 
many action works, there are numerous continuity issues such as the 
convenient vanishing of walls and violations of physics. The writers 
must have seen how Kevin Pollak was merely reprising his excellent 
performance from The Usual Suspects in this film and slipped in a 
blatantly ripped off line, "Satan's greatest trick was convincing man he 
didn't exist." Perhaps the movie's tagline, "The end is near," is meant 
to reassure audiences of the closing credits.

Author
Sean Townsend
STARRING:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Kevin Pollak, Gabriel Byrne, Robin
Tunney, Rod Steiger, CCH Pounder
DIRECTOR:  Peter Hyams (The Relic, The Presidio)
WRITTEN BY:  Andrew W. Marlowe (Air Force One)
Once upon a time in the summer of 1987, in the small town of Spruce
Grove, my friend and I sat in my parents' car outside the local movie
theater, trying to think of a way to get in to see Predator, starring
Arnold Schwarzenegger.  You see, we were only 16-- not old enough to get
into the R-rated picture, but certainly old enough to want to.  Very,
very badly.     So there we sat, feverishly thinking of ways to overcome
every possible objection the person at the ticket booth might raise to
our getting in.  After almost an hour of this, we were finally ready to
try it.  The much-feared counter clerk barely gave us a glance as he
sold us our coveted tickets.  What followed was some of the coolest shit
I had ever seen in a movie.  When it ended I was pretty sure that, given
enough weaponry, Schwarzenegger would kick even the Devil's ass but
good.  All of which brings me to End of Days, and the point of this
little anecdote.  Apparently, 16-year-old boys are greenlighting films
these days.
The film casts the Austrian Oak as Jericho Cane, a security specialist
who stumbles upon a conspiracy of Biblical proportions after foiling an
assassination attempt on his investment-banker client.  It seems that
every thousand years, Satan puts in an appearance on Earth in human
guise (the investment banker is this year's host), seeking a predestined
mate.  If he is allowed to consummate his unholy union, the gates of
Hell will be thrown open, and so on and so forth.  Naturally, Jericho
has to find and protect the prospective bedmate not only from Satan, but
also from religious zealots who want to prevent the prophecy by killing
her.  Furthermore, he has to do it without the help of the police,
because they're all in thrall to the Devil.  Hey, waitaminnit... that
means it's Schwarzenegger vs. Lucifer, one-on-one!  Arnold has plenty of
military hardware, but the Devil has extremely explosive piss.  While
this may have made for a funny episode of South Park, the laughs in End
of Days are strictly unintentional..
About a third of the way into this hokum, it becomes increasingly clear
that Hyams' solution when the nonsensical story starts to drag is to
either show tit or blow something up.  I started wishing I was
elsewhere.  At the two-thirds mark, I was trying to figure out where I'd
seen baby-faced actress Tunney before (it was in 1996's The Craft.)  By
the time the credits mercifully rolled, I found myself wondering how
someone with the offscreen business savvy and intelligence of
Schwarzenegger could have been talked into doing this lamentable
picture.  Not since Commando has his peculiar brand of acting been so
unwatchable.  Normally, his self-effacing sense of humor pulls him
through, but all his half-hearted attempts at wisecracks fall horribly
flat this time.  Pollak, saddled with a poor man's version of Tom
Arnold's True Lies role as the regular-guy buddy, isn't much better
off.  Even Byrne, who could have made much of his diabolical role with a
decent script, is reduced to ogling women and smirking a lot as proof of
his character's ultimate evil.  Much of the dialogue is unforgivable; I
actually groaned out loud during one particularly idiotic interlude in
which Jericho is tempted by Satan (as if the unsubtle initials weren't
enough.)  Eventually, the obligatory climactic effects blowout arrives,
and we get to see the Devil in the flesh, so to speak.  Like everything
else that happens in the movie, it's a letdown, a bit of unconvincing
computer-generated silliness lifted out of some mindless videogame.
As a longtime Schwarzenegger fan, I hope the man realizes that the title
of this miserable failure of a movie also applies to his tenure as an
iconic action hero.  At 54, he's still in incredible shape, but he's
older nonetheless, and so are the teenagers who once elevated him to
box-office champion status.  If he is to remain relevant in the
Hollywood of the 21st century, he'll have to find a Clint Eastwood-esque
way to segue gracefully into a new identity.

Author
R.L. Strong
UNIVERSAL PICTURES AND BEACON PICTURES PRESENTS ARNOLD
SCHWARZENEGGER   A PETER HYAMS FILM "END OF DAYS" GABRIEL BYRNE  KEVIN
POLLACK  ROBIN TUNNEY
ROD STEIGER  MUSIC SUPERVISOR G. MARQ ROSWELL  MUSIC BY JOHN DEBNEY
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS MARC ABRAHAM  THOMAS A. BLISS PRODUCED BY ARMYAN
BERNSTEIN  BILL BORDAN WRITTEN BY ANDREW W. MARLOWE  DIRECTED BY PETER
HYAMS
"You'll never know what you'll agree too when you're on fire!"
 And most will feel burned by this latest offering from the king of
action, Arnold Schwarzenegger. A trite and overly complex plot about
Satan's coming to Earth to father his son. A hodge-podge of ideas and
themes lifted almost verbatim from a host of other, better films.
1979.. a monk in the Vatican, recognizing a prophetic astrological
occurrence; alerts the Pope that the bride of Satan has been born. An
argument between the counsel and the Pope ensues, one side believing
that the Child must be killed, the other believing that she must be
protected. The Pope decrees, that the child must be protected and that
we must have faith in God.
As the child is born, An intern (Udo Kier) in a New York hospital
delivers the newborn to a group of Satanists in the basement of the
hospital  where she is fed the blood of a rattlesnake, the gathered
looking on in awe and enlightenment.
Flash forward 20 years to December 28th, 1999. As Satan rises up from
the city's sewer system (destroying a city block in the process), he
then possesses the body of  New York socialite (Gabriel Byrne) and
destroys another city block in a firestorm.
We are now introduced to Schwarzenegger 's character, Jericho Cane
(subtlety in names is not a concern here), an alcoholic and suicidal
New York detective. He is currently serving as protection for the
aforementioned Socialite. When an assassination attempt goes bad,
Jericho gives chase, hanging from a helicopter by a cable. Catching
and losing his suspect, the chase continues into the subway system,
where the assassin is caught and found to be Thomas Aquinas (Derrick
O'Connor) an elderly Priest, who rants about the end of the Thousand
years (a biblical reference to Christ's rule over the Earth).
Somehow, Jericho and his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak) find Aquinas'
lair in the sewers. Amidst all of the religious scribblings and
newspaper clippings proclaiming the end of the world, they find a
newspaper photo of a young girl. We are then introduced to Christine
York (Robin Tunney) as she is approached by a street urchin, who
accosts her with warnings of an impending rape. As she grabs his arm,
the man shatters into thousands of pieces like glass. Christine
screams, upsetting the passengers on the train who have seen nothing,
as this was a hallucinations. Christine apologizes to her fellow
passengers for her outburst.
I'm not going to go into any further detail of this plot, since if
these already absurd situations haven't already eliminated any desire
you may have had to see this film, than nothing I can say in this
review will change your mind. Suffice to say, you have been warned.
For those of you that need to understand my complete dislike of this
film, let me continue.
The script by Andrew W. Marlowe (1997's "Air Force One") is hackneyed
to say the least. No research into biblical scriptures of any kind was
done, as made clear by the idea that our current time period is being
ruled by Christ ('The thousand years are over!"). As anyone who has
gone to church should know that Christ's rule happens after the battle
between heaven and hell.. But this is only the most minor of
convoluted ideas and plot contrivances retched up for this
Thanksgiving gift. The scripts' utter lack of knowledge of what
religion and faith is, (and for that matter what makes a good horror
film) are tantamount to blasphemy. But suffice to say, that this
Thanksgiving turkey is nothing more that baloney.
Christine is surrounded by loyal worshippers of Satan, who conspire to
make her the bride of their dark Lord. Why, we are not told. Why there
are two factions within the Catholic Church is also glossed over.
Every minion of Satan has superhuman strength, but can't survive
bullets. And Arnold can just walk into an armory and carry out more
weapons than the National Guard without the slightest protest. This is
a jig-saw puzzle type script. The mix of ideas and themes lifted from
films such as "Rosemary's Baby", "The Omen", "Godfather 3", "The
Devil's Advocate" and too many others to mention could almost
constitute copyright infringement. There is not one original idea or
concept here. This is just possibly one of the worst horror films ever
made by a major studio. Scenes from other films are lifted almost
verbatim. This is almost as maddening as "Godzilla" (which still ranks
as the most brain dead film of the 90's)
Arnold Schwarzenegger is horribly miscast as an alcoholic, self
destructive man. If anyone looked at the character as written, and
looked at Arnold's physique, one would assume that alcohol, consumed
in daily quantities of a gallon or more has the same effect as
Popeye's spinach. I found myself laughing out loud, at some of the
trademark Arnold one liners in this one, all about as subtle as those
used in "Batman and Robin".
As it is, the performances as acceptable. The surprise here is Gabriel
Byrne as the Devil in the Flesh. Without any other motivation that to
be as coldly evil as possibly, Byrne manages to have fun with the
part, drawing the only source of fluidity and fun out of this desert
of a script. Robin Tunney as the victim Christine York does what she
can with a role more under written than that of Byrne's. She does have
a presents on screen, and hopefully she can move on to better roles.
Kevin Pollak turns in the obligatory comic side kick role with his
usual aplomb. Nothing more, nothing less. The greatest miscarriage
here, is the utter waste of Rod Steiger as Father Kovak. His sole
purpose to spout out exposition to help explain a hopelessly muddled
plot. The rest of the cast does their jobs adequately, knowing full
well that in this film no one will notice the performances. This is a
fine example of film that relies on its special effects for any
entertainment it may have. The problem.. like everything else in the
film is we've seen them before.
The direction by Peter Hyams is similar to his work on both "The
Relic" and the Jean Claude Van Damme vehicles "Sudden Death" and
"Timecop". Neither praise nor pan, Mr. Hyams does what he does best,
and that's putting together an amusing action scene.
To sum up the experience of watching "End of Days", I'll quote a
dialogue exchange from the film.
Satan: I can give you whatever you want. Just tell Me.. what do you
want?
Jericho: I want.. you.. to go to Hell!

Author
Greg King
END OF DAYS (M).  
(Beacon/Village Roadshow)
Director: Peter Hyams
Stars: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollack, 
Rod Steiger, CCH Pounder, Derrick O'Connor, Miriam Margolyes,
Mark Margolis, Udo Kier
Running time: 120 minutes.
After a two year hiatus from the screen, a period that
included heart surgery, Arnold Schwarzenegger is back to prove that he
is still the main man when it comes to big budget action films.
Guiding him through his paces in his return to the screen is Peter
Hyams (Capricorn One, etc), who gave fallen action star Jean-Claude
Van Damme two of his best films in Time Cop and the Die Hard clone
Sudden Death.  Thankfully, End Of Days is Schwarzenegger's best action
flick since True Lies.
Best described as The Omen meets The Terminator, End Of Days
is the first major mainstream film to tap into the paranoia and fear
surrounding the end of the millennium and the uncertainty surrounding
what the brave new world will bring.  Written by Andrew Marlowe (Air
Force One, etc) the film deftly mixes Biblical prophecies about doom
and the end of the world with pyrotechnics and spectacular action
sequences.
Here Arnie tackles no less a villain than Satan himself.  In
the form of Gabriel Byrne, the devil has come to New York to wreak
havoc according to an ancient prophecy from the Book Of Revelations.
He has to consummate his relationship with the virginal Christine
(Robin Tunney, from The Craft, etc) in the hour before midnight to
consolidate his power in this world.  Christine has been specially
protected by guardians since her birth to ensure she is kept pure for
Satan's inevitable arrival.
Arnie plays Jericho Cane (a suitably Biblical name for a
flawed hero), a former cop now working as a body guard for a high tech
protection firm.  He becomes involved in trying to protect Christine,
not only from the devil himself, but from a hit squad of Vatican
sanctioned assassin priests, who want her removed for obvious reasons.
Arnie is back to doing what he does best, carrying high power
weaponry, destroying half a city and killing half the population of a
major city to perform his duty.  However, his seemingly invulnerable
character here has a little more depth than we normally expect from
the one dimensional Schwarzenegger, although his act of sacrificing
himself to save mankind reeks of the end of Terminator 2.
Kevin Pollack does his familiar schtick as the wise cracking
off sider, and brings some humour to proceedings.  Byrne (who hits for
the good guys in the forthcoming spooky religious thriller Stigmata)
does a wonderfully malevolent job as the devil in human form.  Rod
Steiger (who was originally slated for the Byrne role) contributes a
smaller role as a priest who urges our hero to have faith.
End Of Days may lack a little in the logic department, but it
certainly makes up for these failings with some spectacularly staged
action sequences and great special effects.  Hyams, who also doubles
as cinematographer, handles the action with his usual efficiency, and
he doesn't let either his star or his audience down.

Author
Steve Rhodes
"There are forces at work here that you couldn't possibly understand!"
Father Kovak (Rod Steiger) loudly lectures Jericho Cane (Arnold
Schwarzenegger).  No kidding!
And I thought STIGMATA was bad.  Peter Hyams's over-the-top END OF DAYS
can best be thought of as STIGMATA's evil twin.
The story starts in 1979, as the Pope and his Cardinals are arguing over
a girl who will be born shortly at some unknown location in the world.
Most of the Cardinals want to find and kill her, but they are
temporarily overruled by the Holy Father, who wants instead to find and
protect her.
Cutting to New York City, we see her birth, after which servants of the
devil whisk the baby away.  Graphically slicing open a live rattlesnake,
they sprinkle its blood over the baby, and they have the baby drink the
blood.  Unfortunately, this is one of the more subtle scenes in a movie
that doesn't know when to stop.  But we'll get to its excesses in a
minute.  Suffice it to say that if members of the Catholic Church feel
that they have to picket a movie, this is the one to go for, not DOGMA,
which has been unjustly maligned.
The story quickly skips ahead two decades.  It's now three days before
the millennium.
Yes, this is a millennium film.  Think about it.  Writer Andrew W.
Marlowe had the opportunity of a lifetime, and the best that he could
come up with is a hackneyed story about the Antichrist and the end of
the world.  (For what could be done with a more intelligent approach,
see the recent and wonderfully imaginative character study, Don
McKellar's LAST NIGHT, about the world's end.)
I will not tell you the intricacies of the plot so that you can laugh at
it as I did.  The only thing that makes the movie even partially
bearable is the humor, most of it unintentional.  In an intelligent but
all too brief performance, Kevin Pollak plays Jericho's sidekick,
Chicago.  He also delivers most of the truly funny lines.  His best
comes after a bad experience with the forces of evil.  "Well, it's
official," Chicago informs Jericho.  "I'm not sleeping again."  For all
of its gore -- and there's lots of it -- the movie isn't the least bit
frightening.  It is, however, frequently gross and disgusting, not to
mention sacrilegious and amoral.  But, the movie tries to argue that
"the devil made me do it."  Its excesses, you see, aren't its fault.
It's just trying to depict evil.
Along with the baby and the blood scene, the movie has other satanical
delights.  One mother commits incest with her daughter as they both lay
naked in bed.  The devil is there too you see, and he made them do it.
A bunch of priests keep trying to kill the innocent girl, Christine York
(Robin Tunney), with whom the devil has chosen to mate.  As they rattle
off the Last Rites, they try to murder her first in her own bed and
later by the altar in church.  Again, it's not their fault, they are
killing to defeat the devil, played in a shockingly bad performance by
Gabriel Byrne.  (The devil likes to mock God, as when he refers to the
Bible as "an overblown press kit."  The cheesy dialog will have you
shaking your head.)
Wasting over a hundred million dollars, the director calls for lots of
explosions and special effect after special effect for no reason other
than the studio gave him too much money.  Moviegoers who count their
enjoyment by the boom will be satisfied; others will be disappointed and
exhausted by it all.  The film relentlessly beats you over the head with
the material.  Only when it gets so ridiculous that it causes the
audience to laugh out loud does it break the tedium.
Arnold, Arnold, Arnold, what were you thinking when you signed on to do
this?  Even if it has enough violence and gore to attract large
audiences, you are better than this.
"How do you expect to defeat me when you are but a man, and I am
forever?" Satan taunts Jericho.  The ending, of course, is never really
in doubt, no matter how much bluster the devil manages.  After all, he's
up against a superstar.  And in the end, the story finds its own
redemption, arguing that it had deeply religious intentions all along.
Making audiences believe this will take a real miracle.
END OF DAYS runs 1:55.  It is rated R for intense violence and gore, a
strong sex scene and language and would not be acceptable for those
under 17 or 18.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Gary Jones
I have no objection to mindless action movies, but End Of Days is so
truly brain-dead, so utterly moronic, that it sets a miserable new
benchmark of awfulness for Hollywood blockbusters. Compares to End Of
Days, Die Hard was Hamlet and True Lies was Finnegans Wake. The film is
not technically incompetent like some zero-budget straight-to-video
actioner, but is a big-budget mainstream Hollywood studio production
directed by dependable journeyman Peter Hyams all of which makes the
direness of this movie much more depressing.
Arnold Schwartzenegger plays security man Jericho Cane (Jericho
Religious reference. Geddit?) who is part of the team protecting a
mysterious figure whom they suspect is a powerful Wall St. businessman.
He is actually the Devil, who has come to earth and taken the human form
of Gabriel Byrne. Lucifer is on a mission to impregnate a young woman,
chosen from birth to bear his demonic offspring, thus fulfilling a
biblical prophecy and bringing about the end of days. For reasons
unexplained, the diabolic coupling must take place on the stroke of
midnight on 31st December 1999. We know all this, but Cane doesn't, so
his departure into action-movie cliche-land makes no sense. But then
nothing much makes sense in this movie. The selected Bride of Satan
(played by Robin Tunney) is called Christine York. The way in which Cane
figures out this name is as staggeringly stupid as the explanation by
Father Kovak (played by an suitably embarrassed-looking Rod Steiger)
that the number of the beast is not 666, but is actually 1999 because
that's what you get when you turn 666 upside-down and stick a 1 in
front. Sheesh.
Having mysteriously decided to track down some unknown woman, and
amazingly concluded what her name is, Cane turns up just in time to save
her from a Vatican hit-squad. (Trust me, I cannot possibly make this
movie sound any more stupid than it actually is.) Then all he has to do
is protect the virginal Miss York's honour and thereby save the world.
Arnie's limitations as an actor are cruelly exposed by the script, which
laughably attempts to draw Cane as complex character wrestling with his
loss of faith after the deaths of his wife and daughter. Gabriel Byrne
is actually rather good, and is the only person involved in this piece
of junk who survives with credibility intact.
I do not know how much Andrew H. Marlowe was paid for his original
screenplay, but whatever it was, it was too much. This crude amalgam of
The Exorcist, The Omen, and Terminator 2 could have been written by any
college student with a free weekend and a supply of beer and pizza.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
John Beachem
The ability to suspend ones disbelief is a vital trait when attending a
Schwarzengger movie. However, due to the absence of a good film from the big
Austrian for quite some time, people seem to have forgotten this. The biggest
complaint I hear about "End of Days" is that it was unbelievable. I'm sorry,
but I personally believe it is incredibly naive to expect Arnold to appear in a
realistic film.
Twenty years ago, a newborn girl was chosen by a Satanic cult to be the one who
would bear the child of Satan. Now, young Christine (Robin Tunney) is grown up
and is being stalked by three different groups: Two church factions, one intent
on killing her; and the other, led by Father Kovak (Rod Steiger), attempting to
protect and hide her; the third party is Satan himself, possessing the body of
a Wall Street banker (Gabriel Byrne). Drawn into the conflict are Jericho Cane
(Arnold Schwarzenegger) and Chicago (Kevin Pollak), two bodyguards hired by the
man they do not know to be Satan. As Cane is drawn deeper and deeper into the
conflict, he learns that Christine must not be impregnated or the world will
come to an end. 
If you don't like Arnold movies, chances are you already know to steer clear of
this one. If this somehow hasn't occured to you, let me reassure you that this
is a Schwarzenegger film in the truest sense, so stay far away. Being a typical
film of the Schwarzenegger genre, this movie is a whole lot of fun, but be sure
to leave your brain and sense of logic at the door. There are more plot holes
here than I can begin to count. This movie isn't about plot though. It's about
fight scenes, explosions and special effects. These are certainly present in
abundance.
On the down side, the acting here is certainly less than phenomenal from the
leads. As all know, Arnold isn't going to get any Oscar nominations in the near
future. However, he is charismatic enough to get away with this. Robin Tunney,
on the other hand, is likely to get nominated for at least one award, and
that's the Razzie. Not only is she laughably bad in this role, but she looks
utterly dumbfounded as to what she's supposed to be doing half the time. As for
the rest of the cast, Rod Steiger is as good as ever; Kevin Pollak is certainly
in his element as a smart alec of a side-kick; and CCH Pounder, a remarkable
actress, is woefully underused as a police detective. The real standout
performance here comes from Gabriel Byrne as The Man (this is how he's
credited) himself. Byrne simply oozes charm and authority. Watch for a scene in
which he meets a skateboarder who disrespects him.
"End of Days" is mindless movie fun nearly at its best. It doesn't quite make
it because the film does border on being too mindless at times. Some of the
scenes we are expected to swallow will have you gawking at the screen in
disbelief (such as how Cane discovers the existence of Christine). If you think
you can get past this, just sit back, relax, and enjoy. "End of Days" runs a
touch too long at 120 minutes. I give it three and a half stars, and a
recommendation to catch a matinee.
Feel free to e-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Arnold Schwarzenegger's new action vehicle End of Days seemed like it
went on for days.  The mindless thriller - Arnie's first in two years -
takes place during the final four days of the upcoming millennium and
feels like it was shot in real-time.  The premise is that Satan needs to
impregnate a `chosen' female before the clock strikes 12 in order to be
released from his prison.  They didn't specifically say it, but I think
the prison may be Joliet.
The opening credits utilize every bad religious cliché they could dig up
 fire, snakes, spooky singing and Arabic text.  The film kicks off in
1979 Vatican City, Rome, where an astrological event known as `The Eye
of God' is seen by an underling of the Pope.  The presence of the `Eye'
means that somewhere in the world, a girl is to be born that will, in
twenty years' time, be impregnated by Satan.  The Pontiff dispatches men
to find the girl (yeah, right) and keep her from evil for a couple of
decades.  Sounds reasonable, right?  Six hours later, the `chosen'
infant girl is born in New York City, the evilest place in the world in
1979.
Flash to present-day (December 28, 1999, to be exact) where Satan
returns to Earth, taking over the body of a Wall Street banker (Gabriel
Byrne, who just played a priest in Stigmata) in the men's room of a posh
NYC eatery.  Despite his new form (and his invincibility), Satan still
feels the need to hire protection services to venture around the Big
Apple.  Enter Jericho Cane (Schwarzenegger, Batman & Robin) a drunk
ex-cop (isn't Bruce Willis supposed to get these roles?) with a funny
sidekick called Chicago (Kevin Pollak, She's All That).  They both have
great names, but each pales in comparison to Satan.
The `chosen' girl (Robin Tunney, Niagara, Niagara), now twenty, doesn't
show up until thirty minutes into the film.  Her name is Christine York
(get it  Christ-ine?).  Both of her parents are dead and she's been
having strange visions for most of her life and, as a result, pops pills
and sees a shrink (Udo Kier, Blade).  As a side note, if your therapist
looks like Udo Kier  run for your life.  One of the visions involves a
creepy cross-eyed subway freak that tells her, `He's coming, and he's
going to f--- you!' before shattering like a frozen Robert Patrick in
T2.  Why this person has not yet been cast in a Harmony Korine film is
beyond me.
One of the catches in Satan's plan is that he has to conceive between
11:00 PM and 12:00 AM on New Year's Eve.  What are the odds that she is
even ovulating at that time?  Arnie even gets off a great line,
rhetorically asking if Satan's plot is designed around Eastern Standard
Time.  The writers laugh it off with some quick blurb about Gregorian
calendars being created for this very reason.  Plus, you've gotta figure
that Satan really needs to start working on the girl at around 11:40 at
the latest.  He seems like the kind of guy who likes to sweet-talk the
ladies.  I figure ten minutes of foreplay, five for the actual `act,'
and then five minutes of cuddle-time.
End of Days does have a few cool visuals (from special effects wiz Stan
Winston) and one legitimately scary scene, but that was lifted from
Se7en (and Kevin Spacey was a much scarier villain than the Devil,
anyway).  Speaking of Spacey, they also lifted his `Satan's greatest
trick was convincing the world he didn't exist' line from The Usual
Suspects.  Satan's giant head of fire (an effect ruined by the trailer)
is cool, but we've already seen it in The Mummy (and it wasn't that
great to begin with).  Also disappointing was Satan's non-human form
which, when revealed at the end, seemed a lot like Buffy's principal in
the season finale last season.  The pre-sold `modern rock' soundtrack
was all but missing from the film.
Directed by Peter Hyams (The Relic) and written by Andrew W. Marlowe
(Air Force One), Days features an incredibly hammy performance by
Schwarzenegger, who, in one scene, even gets to cry when he thinks about
Jericho's dead wife and kid.  Tunney, who was so good in Niagara,
Niagara, seems both badly lost and miscast.  Going from indie pics like
Niagara and Julian Po to a Schwarzenegger film doesn't seem like a
logical jump at all.  Plus, she has one of the most unnecessary nude
scenes in recent memory  goodbye, credibility!  Byrne chews the scenery
as the Horned One, who, we learn, is able to piss gasoline.  Rod Steiger
(Crazy in Alabama) plays a puffy priest that would rather rely on faith
to save Christine, while some of his churchie cohorts would just as soon
kill her to put an end to the whole saga.
But, seriously, how much faith can you put into a film that doesn't
reveal the name of its main character until ninety minutes in?
(Christine says his name at this point, which is the first time we hear
it.)  And speaking of faith, where the Christ is the good guy in all of
this?  Yeah, I'm talking about the big `G.'  Can't we rely on him to
give us a hand when Satan plans on turning our sphere into Hell on
Earth?  He was a no-show.  A non-factor.  You can kiss your tithe
goodbye, Ms. Morrissette.
2:00 - R for intense violence and gore, a strong sex scene, nudity and
adult language

Author
Nick Lyons
  Arnold Schwarzenegger has been an icon for action enthusiasts, since the late
80's, but lately his films have been very sloppy and the one-liners are getting
worse. It's hard seeing Arnold as Mr. Freeze in Batman And Robin, especially
when he says tons of ice jokes, but hey he got 15 million, what's it matter to
him? Once again Arnold has signed to do another expensive blockbuster, that
can't compare with the likes of The Terminator series, True Lies and even
Eraser.
  In this so called dark thriller, the devil (Gabriel Byrne) has come upon
earth, to impregnate a woman (Robin Tunney) which happens every 1000 years, and
basically destroy the world, but apparently God has chosen one man, and that
one man is Jericho Cane (Arnold himself). With the help of a trusty sidekick
(Kevin Pollack), they will stop at nothing to let the devil take over the
world! 
  Parts of this are actually so absurd, that they would fit right in with
Dogma. Yes, the film is that weak, but it's better than the other blockbuster
right now (Sleepy Hollow), but it makes The World Is Not Enough look like a 4
star film. Anyway, this definitely doesn't seem like an Arnold movie. It just
wasn't the type of film you can see him doing. Sure he gave us a few chuckles
with his well known one-liners, but he seemed confused as to where his
character and the film was going. It's understandable, especially when the
ending had to be changed according to some sources.  Aside form that, he still
walked through it, much like he has in the past few films. I'm sorry to say
this Arnold but maybe these are the end of your action days.
  Speaking of action, where was it in this film? There was hardly any
explosions or fights. The devil made a few places explode, but Arnold wasn't
kicking some devil butt. The ending was changed to make it more spiritual,
which undoubtedly ruined the film. I was at least hoping for a cool ending if
nothing else occurred, but once again I was let down. I also don't know why the
film took so long and cost so much. There was really no super affects at all,
unless you consider an invisible devil, who was in it for 5 minutes tops, worth
the overpriced budget. The budget should have gone into a better script, where
at least audiences could be somewhat entertained instead of facing boredom.
It's pitiful to see how scripts like these get bought and made into a movie. Do
they even read these things anymore? It sure doesn't seem like it.
  Thankfully Gabriel's performance gave some light to this poor film. When he
walks down the street searching for Robin Tunney, you can't help but feel that
he looked like a devil. The guy is creepy looking anyway! 
  When it's all over, you're just glad it's the end of the movie. Don't bother
to see this, if you're expecting a solid action flick, because it's neither
solid nor does it have action. It's just another movie that we are suckered in
to seeing, due to a strategic marketing campaign. Save your money and see the
World Is Not Enough for an entertaining experience.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
There's no way I can review Peter Hyams' End of Days without sounding
like a bully, so it may as well hand over its lunch money now. While
there's a certain amount of glee involved in watching a movie composed
almost entirely of cliches, explosions, and howlingly bad dialogue,
there isn't a whole lot of entertainment value. Well, that may not be
entirely true: there are plenty of laugh-out-loud moments in End of
Days... which would be good news indeed, if the film was a comedy. 
It's the end of the millenium, and Satan (Gabriel Byrne) has come to
Earth to claim a bride. The lucky gal is Christine York (Robin
Tunney), a twenty year-old New Yorker who doesn't seem particularly
interested in being a concubine to the Lord of Darkness, so she runs
around and screams a lot. But if the devil can work his
hootchy-cootchy on Ms. York between 11pm and midnight on New Year's
Eve, he will, for reasons I'm still not sure I understand, gain
dominance over Earth. It's up to Jericho (Arnold Schwarzenegger) and
his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak) to save the world, a feat which
will naturally involve blowing up lots of stuff. 
End of Days is so stupifyingly silly that I don't even know where to
begin. The stream of killer urine, perhaps? Or the "fake scares" which
pop up roughly every five minutes or so (you know the drill: someone
walks into a dark room, a jarringly loud chord plays on the
soundtrack, and BOOM!--the cat appears)? Or maybe I should tell you
about Jericho's idea of a nutritious breakfast? It doesn't matter;
suffice it to say there's no shortage of pointlessness to be found
here, with the silliness culminating in a lovely scene in which Arnold
gets his buff ass kicked by a fretful middle-age Jewish housewife. 
One of the things I've come to realize as a critic is that I'm often
harshest to films which personally disappoint me in some way, rather
than those which are completely wretched from start to finish. End of
Days annoys me in a very specific manner: it had potential. Indeed,
there is one scene roughly two-thirds of the way through the film
which actually borders on wonderful: the face-to-face confrontation
between Jericho and Satan. Everything clicks: the dialogue sparkles,
the performances catch fire, the screenplay resonates with wit. For
these five minutes, the script rivals Kevin Smith's Dogma for
intelligent religious satire.
Alas, this scene is so fascinating that it only serves to underline
the rest of the film's banality. It dangles the lost potential of the
story in front of the audience's eyes like a carrot before a mule.
Paradoxically, this scene is partly responsible for my low rating of
the movie: by revealing the heights which the script and performances
are capable of achieving, I'm all the more disappointed with the
tale's inability to reach its demonstrated potential. Had the movie
been consistently wretched, I may actually have rated it a bit higher:
my expectations wouldn't have been raised, and I wouldn't have thought
the story capable of anything better than mindless entertainment. 
I'm sure I'll get a lot of angry letters over this review, as most of
the audience at the preview screening I attended seemed to be having a
far better time than I was. But unfortunately, I have to call it as I
see it, and I think time will prove me correct--too much of the film
revolves around topical dialogue (the end of the millenium, numerous
jokes about the Y2K bug, etc.) Even the people who like End of Days
right now will surely find it hokey and dated in the near future.
Maybe if we're lucky, it'll disappear for another 1,000 years. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com. 

Author
Lars Lindahl
By Lars Lindahl, High School Student
Š 1999 Lars Lindahl
"End of Days" (1999)
Directed by Peter Hyams
Written by Andrew Marlowe
Starring Arnold Scwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Kevin Pollak, Robin Tunney, Rod
Steiger, Miriam Margoyles, CCH Powder, Udo Kier
Well Arnold has completed the seemingly impossible task. He has made three
consecutive unsatisfactory action films. In a domain that he owns, it is very
surprising that this Goliath of an action star can not tell a good action
script from a bad one. Eraser, back in 1996, was a confused film that made no
attempt at all to make sense. Batman and Robin, in 1997, was the black sheep of
the Batman series with ridiculous acting, idiotic action scenes, and painfully
flashy costumes. Now in 1999, "End of Days" (not "The End of Days") is the
third strike in a tough at bat for Arnold. Is this the end of a powerful action
star's long-lived career? Will Arnold ever give us another unforgettable
performance in another unforgettable classic like those in the past
("Terminator", "Terminator 2: Judgement Day", "Predator")? Or an unforgettable
performance in a great guilty pleasure like those in the past ("Commando", "Red
Sonja", "True Lies")? It doesn't look that way. 
"End of Days" begins with the birth of a baby girl in 1979 who inexorably, due
to the formation of the stars on that night, will be the carrier of Satan's
baby the hour before New Year's of 2000. Fortunately for the movie's sake, the
girl grows up and now resides in Manhattan with skyscrapers, subway trains in
dark tunnels, and a myriad of inept NYPD officers. It's an action film's dream
come true when the director is given tons of cool stuff to blow up. Imagine if
the girl had lived in Anytown, USA, where the only thing to destroy is a Dairy
Queen and a post office. Arnold Schwarzenegger (Jericho Cane), in a series of
boring events finds himself in the middle of a religious battle between the
church, who is trying to hide the girl (or in some cases trying to kill her),
and Satan (Gabriel Byrne) who is trying to make her pregnant. If the Devil is
successful, the world will no longer exist as we know it. Jericho feels it is
his duty to protect the girl from everyone because 1) he once had faith but no
longer does and 2) his wife and daughter were killed and he feels responsible
for it.
Jericho Cane is your cliched, by-the-numbers hero right up to his name. Arnold
fittingly plays the character as cliched as he can. He shouts at everyone, from
cops to priests, to the Devil. In one truly hilarious scene, which was supposed
to be the ultimate dramatic high point, Jericho screams to the Devil; "You are
a @#$^%!& choir boy! You are a choir boy!" Those two lines marked the high
points of this film. 
A movie can still be enjoyable when the supporting cast is more effective than
the main actor. "End of Days" fails to contain any memorable performances with
the exception of Gabriel Byrne. Byrne, playing a man who has been made the
manifestation of the Devil, seems to be the only one who is having fun in this
whole movie. He wonderfully plays a manipulative villain with the power to
control everyone at any time. The annoying thing about his character, however,
is that he has the power to kill any human with a simple punch in the face, yet
he finds it impossible to seriously hurt Jericho. I can not count the number of
times he could have killed Jericho and taken the girl from his custody. The
other actors in the film give very weak and unconvincing performances. Kevin
Pollak, who plays the partner and close friend of Jericho, is the supposedly
funny character in the film (every action movie has one). The one problem is
that Pollak does not deliver one funny line. Robin Tunney plays the chosen
mother of Satan's baby with extreme annoyance. She gets no sympathy from any of
the characters in the film, except Arnold who pretends she is his wife and
daughter, or any of the viewers in the audience. In one unnecessary scene,
Tunney walks out of her room and takes her top off. Is this her job in the
film?
The actors are not to blame entirely because the script is terrible. You can
tell a script is terrible when you are able to predict what will happen minutes
before it does. This little prediction game is a very fun exception to trying
to sit through this nonsense of a movie. In a last attempt to make this movie
good, special effects are used to try to entertain the audience. But without a
memorable action scene in the whole film, the director has not done his job
successfully. This film would have gotten a C+ if Arnold stood in front of a
camera and shouted "You are a !$@^@*^ choir boy!!" for two hours. 

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999 (or is it 6661? I could be reading it upside-down.)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollack,
CCH Pounder, Renee Olstead, Rod Steiger, Derrick O'Connor, Miriam Margolyes,
Udo Keir
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe
Directed by Peter Hyams
Rated R
And I thought "Stigmata" would be the worst religiously-oriented thriller
released this year. Turns out I was wrong, because while "Stigmata" was
merely boring and self-important, "End of Days" is completely inept on all
fronts. It's a silly, incomprehensible, endlessly stupid mess. For a guy
like me who grew up watching Arnold Schwarzenegger at his best, it's
extremely disconcerting to see where the big man has ended up. For the first
time in recent memory, an Arnold action movie (and "Batman & Robin" doesn't
count) is no fun at all. "End of Days" is a major stinker.
The movie opens in Vatican City, 1979. Some Catholic priests have observed
an ancient prophecy, which says that a girl will be born on that night that
Satan will have targeted for impregnation. If he impregnates her between 11
and midnight on December 31, 1999, the world will be destroyed. The pope
orders protection of this girl, though some priests believe she ought to be
killed. In New York, that very night, a girl is born to fulfill the
prophecy. Twenty years later, we meet Jericho Cane (Schwarzenegger), a
suicidal ex-cop with a drinking problem. Now working as a security guard for
hire, he is protecting a local businessman (Gabriel Byrne), who is actually
possessed by the devil. An assassination attempt on the businessman by a
crazed former priest leads him to the girl Satan is after, Christine York
(Robin Tunney). Recognizing elements of his own murdered daughter in
Christine (including ownership of the same music box, apparently), Jericho
swears to protect her against the devil and the faction of priests looking
to kill her.
There are so many problems with this film it's hard to know where to begin,
but how about starting with the concept? Casting Arnold in a role like this
was a mistake to begin with. Schwarzenegger is a persona, not an actor, so
putting him in a role that contradicts his usual strong personality is a bad
idea. Arnold has neither the dramatic range nor the speaking ability to pull
off a character tormented by conflicting emotions. In other words, trying to
give him dimension was a mistake. Harrison Ford, Mel Gibson, or even Bruce
Willis could have played this role (they've all played noble and flawed
heroes), but not Schwarzenegger. There are several scenes that attempt to
establish Jericho's character; one has him contemplating suicide, another
crying over the loss of his wife and daughter, and even one in which the
devil tries to tempt him into revealing Christine's location by offering him
his old life back. None of these scenes really work, because Arnie isn't up
to the task. The filmmakers would have been better off making Jericho a
strong, confident character (like the Terminator, for example), the likes of
which Schwarzenegger has excelled in before. This one isn't at all
believable the way Arnold plays him.
The supporting cast tries their hardest, and only Gabriel Byrne makes any
impact at all. As the Prince of Darkness, he's suave and confident. He acts
like one would expect the devil to act. The problem is that the script has
him doing things that make no sense (more on that later) and that undermines
him as a powerful villain. Byrne out-performs Arnold in every scene they
have together (including the aforementioned temptation bit), but this is
problematic when it causes the audience to start doing the unthinkable: root
for the devil. Byrne's speech about the Bible being "overrated" actually
starts to make sense, mainly because Arnold's attempts at refuting it
(mostly of the "'tis not!" variety) are feeble at best. The only problem is,
Arnold has to win, so in the end, nobody really cares. Kevin Pollack plays
Jericho's security guard sidekick and tries to liven things up with some
comic asides, but like most bad action movie sidekicks, he disappears after
about an hour. Robin Tunney isn't given much to do except look scared. In
fact, all of the supporting players are good actors, but none, save for
Byrne, is given anything interesting to do.
Performances aside, it would be really hard to enjoy this film no matter who
starred in it. This being an action blockbuster, it's no surprise that the
worst thing about it is the script, which starts off totally confusing, and
when some of it is explained (and not much of it is), it's utterly
ridiculous. Why is the devil coming on New Year's Eve, 1999? Because it's
exactly 1000 years after the year of the devil, which isn't 666, it turns
out. Some nutty priest accidentally read it upside down, so the real year is
999, so just add a 1 to the beginning, and you've got 1999! If you don't buy
this explanation, you're not alone. It's convoluted and silly at the same
time. The method by which Jericho locates Christine York is equally
ludicrous (she's Christine, see, and she lives in New York, see . . .), and
if that weren't bad enough, there's plenty of bothersome stuff in this film
that isn't explained at all. Why can Satan kill everyone he passes on the
street, but when it comes to snuffing out one drunk ex-cop, he's powerless?
Is he impervious to only one kind of bullet? How come he can't control
Jericho or Christine? And how did those Gregorian monks deal with time zones
in their prophecies? A clumsy attempt at a joke is made about this, but it's
never actually explained.
Usually, this sort of thing wouldn't matter in a Schwarzenegger flick (I
mean, don't get me started on the time paradoxes offered up by the
Terminator movies), but this time the plot inconsistencies stand out even
more than usual because the action is rarely exciting. There are several
predictable horror film clichés present in "End of Days," complete with the
old "black cat hiding in a cabinet" bit, not that we ever find out what the
cat was doing in there. It gets so formulaic that it's possible for those
uninterested in being scared to close their eyes at the precise moment a
"boo" will come. Their predictions will rarely be wrong. The more grandiose
action sequences are utterly charmless, partially because we don't care
about these characters (due to the script's pathetic attempts at
characterization and setup), and also because they, too, don't make any
sense. There's a scene where Schwarzenegger gets thrown around a room by a
little old lady. It's good for a few chuckles, but not much else. Supposedly
we're to believe she now has super strength by virtue of being controlled by
Satan, but the script never sets that up, so the scene is merely silly. None
of this is terribly exciting, because all the action sequences are so badly
framed that it's often hard to tell why it's happening in the first place,
not to mention that they're edited in full-on incomprehensible MTV quick-cut
style. Most of them had me scratching my head, rather than saying, "Wow,
cool!"
"End of Days" is not only silly and confusing, but it's also distinctly
unpleasant to watch. The devil apparently doesn't operate in the more
subtle, I'll-convince-people-to-kill-each-other fashion outlined in the
Bible, but instead enjoys killing people gruesomely in broad daylight. This
doesn't only make him an awfully predictable sort, but it also means that
not a single scene in "End of Days" goes by without unnecessarily graphic
violence, or the odd kinky sexual encounter (yet another bit that had me
scratching my head). If violence is supposed to be shocking, it's not a good
idea to throw so much of it into a movie that the audience goes numb. Scenes
aren't connected through any reasonable means, so a lot of the time, stuff
gets blown up, or people get killed, and I had no idea why. Reasons? To hell
with reasons! Let's just blow stuff up! Isn't it cool? Nope, not by a long
shot.
This film is thoroughly unwatchable. It's dull, interminable, and
unrelenting in its stupidity. Perhaps Arnold needs to make some movies with
James Cameron to revive his career, because it's not happening with hack
Peter Hyams here. "End of Days" might have had camp value, if only it didn't
top itself off with an overly pious ending that nobody's going to buy. If
the movie is going to be serious, the filmmakers should have come up with a
decent script. If it's going to be campy, Arnold shouldn't be taking himself
so damn seriously (I didn't actually see him put up on a cross, did I?), and
his character shouldn't be such a sad sack. As it stands, "End of Days" is
just a bad movie, and an awfully gloomy one at that.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Berge Garabedian
Fo more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
What movie do you get when you combine all of the better elements from films
like THE OMEN, THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE, STIGMATA, SEVEN and COMMANDO? The
answer is "I don't know" but it ain't this movie, that's fer sure! Arnold
returns to the big screen after his embarrassing ice capading accident in
1997's BATMAN & ROBIN to present us with a new type of Arnold, a drunken,
suicidal ex-cop who's ironically caught in the middle of the hottest topic
du jour, the coming of the millenium and the arrival of Satan, of course.
PLOT:
Satan comes up to Earth to nail the "chosen" woman before the strike of
midnight on New Year's Eve of the year 1999, in order to end all existence
as we know it and unleash the gates of hell onto the world. A drunk ex-cop
and his wise-cracking buddy are out to stop this Angel of Death. Oh yeah,
the drunk ex-cop is played by Arnold Schwarzenegger. Nuff said.
CRITIQUE:
Nothing new here, folks. This uninspired rehash of various other better
thrillers left me indifferent at best and pissed at the missed opportunity
at worst. Ambitious this film was in attempting to tackle the apocalyptic
fears of the coming New Year. Ambitious was its star in attempting to tackle
a new type of role for himself. Unfortunately for both parties, their
respective ambitions lay unfulfilled in a script blotted with plot holes the
size of Arnold's accent, and a star who is truly difficult to accept in any
role separate from the ones which correlate his monosyllabism to strength of
character. Granted, Gabriel Byrne was outstanding as the devil incarnate,
chewing up all kinds of scenery in a role which finally allowed the man to
have a little fun at his job. In fact, there is one particularly great scene
between Arnold and Gabes in his apartment, but other than that, very little
memorable material here. Looking back, there is even less than I remembered.
Did I totally hate this movie? Not at all. In fact, some of its action
scenes were cool, Arnold "looked" the part and the pacing was okay, but
overall, the film lacked that special oomph that one expects from an "Arnold
movie", or even from an original thriller. The funniest part of this movie
(And no, it wasn't Kevin Pollak's one-line quips) is the way Arnold's
character discovers the identity of the girl who they are trying to locate
at the beginning of the film. It has got to be one of the most ridiculously
unbelievable scenes ever written into a serious thriller. "Christ in New
York" is all I will say about that. Anyway, you'll see what I mean when you
see the movie (On video, hopefully). Another little tidbit that ticked off
both my friend and I was the fact that this film made no bones about selling
itself via its hip, heavy soundtrack beforehand, but for some reason, the
final result barely included one noticeable musical ditty. Slap all of that
onto a weak ending, even weaker special effects and you've got yourself a
disappointment waiting to happen. Now if all you Arnold fans are really high
on this schtick or Gabriel Byrne is an actor whom you respect and admire,
than I might suggest you see this one, if only just for the fun of it. For
everyone else, skip this misfire and rent an Arnold classic like PREDATOR or
TOTAL RECALL, or better yet, bite into a much better film which takes place
during the last few nights before the big 2000, STRANGE DAYS.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Soon after 1997's BATMAN & ROBIN movie, Arnold Schwarzenegger underwent
heart surgery to correct a congenital heart valve condition. He has been
married to news reporter Maria Schriver since 1986, with whom he now shares
four children. Before his incredible career in Hollywood, Arnold was once
referred to as "the most perfectly developed man in the history of the
world", according to the Guinness Book of World Records, and was even
credited in one of his own films as Arnold Strong. Word on the street is
that he received $25,000,000 for his role in this movie.
Actor Rod Steiger , who's also in this movie, was once offered the
title role in the movie PATTON, but turned it down, saying that he was not
"going to glorify war." The role was then given to fellow actor George C.
Scott, who won the Oscar for it. Steiger calls this refusal his "dumbest
career move."
Director Peter Hyams used to be a Chicago news anchorman and generally likes
to include a character in all of his film named "Spota". He's also written
several scripts himself including THE STAR CHAMBER, 2010 and NARROW MARGIN.
Actress Robin Tunney's first movie role was in 1992's ENCINO MAN. Her
character was named Ella. His first big lead role was in 1996's witch movie
THE CRAFT.
This film was originally offered to super-kinetic director Sam Raimi, who
turned it down for a shot to direct Kevin Costner in FOR LOVE OF THE GAME
(7.5/10).
Screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe's first produced screenplay was 1997's AIR
FORCE ONE with Garry Oldman and Harrison Ford.

Author
Jamey Hughton
The Austrian accent. The bulging biceps. The memorable punch-lines
uttered right before he empties an entire magazine into a swarm of
foolish villains. When it comes to pure action satisfaction, Arnold
Schwarzenegger is the man of the hour. The imposing star of such
blockbuster hits as `Terminator 2: Judgment Day', `Predator' and `True
Lies', Arnold has become a reliable synonym for the action genre. Of
course, when I say reliable', I'm not including such hazardous bombs as
`Jingle All the Way' and the downright humiliating `Batman and Robin'.
In fact, since the fourth sequel in that misbegotten action series,
Arnie has taken a leave of absence from the silver screen. Just in time
for the year 2000, the millennial thriller `End of Days' marks his
delayed return. Here, Schwarzenegger plays struggling ex-cop Jericho
Cane (sounds almost.... biblical), who finds himself in the midst of an
enormous Satanic dilemma as the new millennium approaches. When I say
Satanic, I mean Beelzebub himself - who has arrived in New York City to
search for a mortal bride, which will signal the birth of the
Anti-Christ and the end of all human existence. All of this must happen
in the final hour before the year 2000 - don't ask me why. Ask
screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe (`Air Force One'), who must have been
exposed to some mind-altering substance while penning this ridiculous
action film.
`End of Days' is a film written with remarkable stupidity. The plot is
tied messily together with absurd coincidences and dialogue that seems
to be extracted from out-takes of an Ernest movie. Many scenes border on
unintentional amusement, and a few shatter that barrier with ease. And
yet, there was a moment in `End of Days' when I just gave up on the
idiotic script and decided to embrace all of the Satanic shenanigans for
simple fun. This moment arrived when Jericho is greeted in his apartment
by an uninvited Lucifer, who has taken over the body of a Wall Street
banker in his attempt to hunt down the chosen bride. Inhabiting his new
body (which, coincidentally, is the wonderful Gabriel Byrne), Satan
tries to tempt Arnold with erasing a terrible memory from his past. It's
really a terrific scene, giving Byrne the chance to flash his demonic
charisma, and offering Satan a few snappy punch-lines (particularly when
he claims The Bible is merely an `overblown press kit').
This is Marlowe's one great scene of exchanging dialogue, and from
there, `End of Days' never looks back. Taking the ball is director Peter
Hyams, who knows how to frame a well-choreographed action sequence to
near perfection, and does so in a pair of extravagant scenes that
include all the usual Arnold ingredients: rapid gunfire, colossal
explosions and lots of physical exertion on the part of the star. The
stand-out is probably an impressively mounted and exciting chase on a
subway, in which Arnold protects Satan's bride-to-be (Robin Tunney) with
the man himself in hot pursuit. Frankly, I am sick and tired of hearing
all that crap about Hyams' tendency to be a hack'. The man cannot build
characters, and he rarely derives a solid performance out of an actor,
but his photography is stylish and his technical approach is often
effective. His last film, 1996's creature feature `The Relic', is quite
the possibly the most underrated monster movie in recent memory.
Here, Hyams once again teams with special effects guru Stan Winston (who
also did creature effects for `The Relic'). Unfortunately, although
somewhat nifty, a large portion of the CGI work in `End of Days' is
disappointing and choppy. The only truly effective moment is the final
showdown in an abandoned church, where Winston's creature effects are
put to the test. Arnold himself is not given much room to function with
the character of Jericho, although a few amusing one-liners help matters
immensely. Playing the wisecracking partner Chicago, Kevin Pollack is
used specifically for comic leftovers, but as always, he's a good fellow
to have around. The one true performance that warrants a second
examination is Gabriel Byrne's, who is smashing fun as Satan's human
transport.
I suppose `End of Days', although thoroughly mediocre, is somewhat fun
in the end. It's likely to impress Arnold fanatics and action buffs who
don't mind the gratuitous gore and insanely moronic screenplay. I
enjoyed certain aspects of it - like the scene where Jericho has the
living tar beaten out of him by a little old nanny (Mariam Margolyes),
which is embarrassing for Arnold despite the fact the nanny is a
superpowered minion of Satan.
The action was cool. A few of the performances were enjoyable. For a
Y2K-based thriller, `End of Days' could have been so much more
intelligent and explosive - the showdown of Arnold and Satan should have
been classic. As is, it's merely ridiculous, embarrassing fun.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton
http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
Proud NEW Member of The Online Film Critics Society.
Comments Appreciated!  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Since "End of Days" and Neil Jordan's "The End of the
Affair" are playing simultaneously in many theaters, you just
might be confused about which to see.  I can imagine
Richard Kwientniowsky's creation, Giles De'ath, heading for
the literary film based on the Graham Greene novel and
winding up seeing a mediocre actor with big pecs throwing
his weight around in the far more visceral universe of Peter
Hyams.  He might exclaim, "I say, Ralph Fiennes must be
working out these days!"  On second thought, there is at least
one point of congruence between the plodding Canadian
novel and the high-speed vehicle for Arnold Schwarznegger. 
Graham Greene's book is suffused with a mystical run of
Catholic convictions, principally with a belief that some
minor miracles can happen in our own, expiring century. 
For example, when Sarah Miles gently kisses the cheek of
the young detective, his huge birthmark gradually disappears. 
More important, God presents Sarah with an apparent
miracle that ironically ends her affair with the novelist Maurice
Bendrix.
   Despite the belief in the occult that Greene shares with
"End of Days" director Peter Hyams, the audience for the two
movies is not likely to be the same.  The heavily marketed
millennium disaster movie is as high caliber as the Canadian
novel is lumbering and Schwarznegger is to Ralph Fiennes 
as Ed Wood is to Alfred Hitchcock.
   As chock full of logical flaws as it is loaded with brimstone
and fire, "End of Days," which features a mock, Greek-
tragedy ending (think Ajax), recalls such pseudo=religious
movies as "The Omen" and "Stigmata."  Despite its portrayal
of some high-ranking church officials as hoodlums, there
hasn't been a peep from the Vatican about the show while
Catholic groups have rallied against such dulcet, pro-faith
fairy tales like "Dogma."  Perhaps the obvious cartoonish
violence and pointless performances (wasting such talents as
Kevin Pollak and Miriam Margolyes) are so obviously tongue-
in-cheek that the theme could not offend anyone in the
audience.
  Nonetheless, "End of Days" is more watchable than some
critics would have you think.  Just observing Miriam
Margolyes beat the stuffing out of Arnold Schwarznegger
might be worth the price of admission.  The scene with
Gabriel Byrne as the Devil's agent speaking of his intended
bride "I'd treat her like a queen" will have to make do for
laughs in a film which--given the flat-falling one-liners of
Kevin Pollak--will have to make do for comedy.  In only one
case does Andrew W. Marlowe's script rise to the level of wit,
as The Man (Gabriel Byrne), infused with Satan's spirit,
compares the Bible to a publicist's press kit.  "When things
turn out well, we say 'It's God's will.'  When they turn out
bad, it's 'God works in mysterious ways.'"
   The story gets under way when a priest rushes into the
inner chambers of the Vatican to announce to the seated
Pope, "The child will be born today."  The year is 1979 and in
a hospital, a newborn girl is rushed from her mother's womb
to a mysterious chamber where doctors and nurses (including
the notable English performer Miriam Margolyes) observe as
a physician cuts open the belly of a snake and smears the
blood over the infant--who is ironically named Christine. 
Twenty years later, that little girl is a pixieish orphan (Robin
Tunney) who is destined to have a brief affair with the Devil
himself, to spend some time in bed while everyone else
crowds around Times Square to watch the birth of the new
millennium.  According to Scriptures--as interpreted by the
prescient priest (Rod Steiger)--during the final hour of our
own century, Satan is to mate with this particular woman,
who will give birth to the anti-Christ.  The Devil will then reign
over the Earth: unless, that is, a former cop, Jericho Cane
(Arnold Schwarznegger) who quit the force when the murder
of wife and child left him chronically depressed, can end the
affair before it begins.  With his cynically jocular partner
Chicago (Kevin Pollak), he determines to protect the 20-year-
old woman from The Man (who, as fans of Gabriel Byrne
know would be irresistible to women even if the Devil had not
entered his body).  
   "End of Days" features plenty of violence of the sort that
would have teens call out "Yeah!" and a couple of fairly sexy
near-encounters, one taking place near the podium of a
church.  If you can forget the logic by which The Man's body
can almost instantly heal damage done to it by bullets and
yet Jericho's bazooka-like artillery can down him for minutes
at a time, you can sit back and enjoy New York undergoing
more mayhem than usual as fires consume churches and
subway trains alike.  Y2K may yet end our days but Peter
Hyams interpretation of havoc is harmless.
Rated R.  Running Time: 118 minutes.  (C) 1999
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Dennis Schwartz

END OF DAYS (director/cinematographer: Peter Hyams; screenwriter: Andrew
W. Marlowe; editor: Steven Kemper; cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger (Jericho
Cane), Gabriel Byrne (the Man), Robin Tunney (Christine York), Kevin
Pollak (Chicago), Rod Steiger (Father Kovak), C.C.H. Pounder (Det.
Margie Francis), Derrick O'Connor (Thomas Aquinas), Rainer Judd
(Christine's Step-Mother), Mark Margolis (Pope); Runtime: 120; Beacon
Pictures/Universal; 1999)
Gun wielding Arnold Schwarzenegger has a change of heart by the film's
end and becomes a believer in God instead of a skeptic, going through an
amazing transformation by having a Christian epiphany in the final scene
as he becomes someone who can now beat the Devil by his faith
alone...this is after two hours of throwing people out windows and
shooting more people than your average serial killer. Nobody can save
this bomb from it's own stupidity and arrogance in filmmaking and
arrogance in believing that this is a positive religious-type of film.
It's just a pile of dreck...an ill-conceived exploitive project, a
pyrotechnical film.
"End of Days" aims to be an apocalyptic thriller. It features an idiotic
script, a hack director, and a one-dimensional star who is past his
prime...which makes this film dumber than dumb, plus it's not funny, not
campy, or is it in the least bit entertaining. It's just dreary and
unwatchable...a big-budget slasher film.
Arnold plays an alcoholic security guard who finds his new mission in
life is to stop Satan (occupying Gabriel Byrne's body and possessing a
Wall St. bank account) from destroying the world. The film opens in
Vatican City, Roma 1979 -- where the Pope is alerted by a young
visionary priest Tomaso, looking out at the night sky and seeing a comet
whiz by, who proclaims after looking at his scrolls -- that's the sign
for the 'Eye of God,' which reveals that a child has been born who is
being prepared to give birth to Satan's baby (the anti-Christ) in the
hour before the new century begins, when Satan will fuck her and open up
the gates to hell on earth. Tomaso has some twenty years to find this
woman and save her and the world from doom. But some in the Pope's
circle want to kill her if found, even though the Pope insists on having
faith and letting her live, as he lectures them: "Even in the world's
darkest days -- doing evil doesn't stop evil, but brings on more evil."
We saw the girl being born in NYC in 1979, which seems to be the
'logical' place to look for Satan according to the astrology charts of
the visionaries. The chosen woman is Christine York (Robin). It is now a
few days before the New Year celebration for 2000 and Arnold and his
wise-cracking security guard partner Kevin Pollack are hired to guard a
Wall Street turd, and when he is fired upon by a renograde priest,
Thomas Aquinas, Arnold saves him and through a ridiculous chase captures
the tongue less priest who fired the shot. He, nevertheless, can speak
and tells Arnold an 'end of days' is coming as prophesized in
Revelations. But Satan gets to him in his hospital room and nails him to
the ceiling while scribbling Latin warnings of 'the end of the world' on
his body.
It is now up to Arnold to save the world and find the chosen woman. He
quickly finds Christine and does everything to protect her from all the
evil forces around her, as the film includes ludicrous helicopter
rescues, people jumping out of windows, Satan taking a piss and dropping
a match to kill Arnold's partner as the piss explodes like gasoline,
Satan being fired at...resulting in his sometimes experiencing pain and
sometimes nothing, as if the director forgot which way he wants to have
it. There is nothing spared in NYC from fire bombs -- including the
subway, churches, and luxury buildings. The only trouble with all these
high-budget action sequences, was that it lacked purpose and even
entertainment value.
The story was so terrible and inaccurate, that it did not have an iota
of value or credibility. Mercifully the movie drags to a final
confrontation in Times Square, trying unsuccessfully to build tension to
the countdown toward the year 2000. Why is the end of 1999 considered to
be the Devil's number "666,'' well! ... Satan's numeral is actually
"999,''  which is upside down of "666.'' Accordingly, you just put a
"1'' in front of it-- and bingo -- you get "1999.'' With logic like
that, this film might even think it pulled the wool over the viewer's
eyes and got away with such a febrile explanation of the occult. This
film should become a classic used by film schools in how not to make a
horror film. I highly recommend seeing it for that purpose.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Bob Bloom
End of Days (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger,
Gabriel Byrne and Kevin Pollak.
TO: SATAN, THE DEVIL, BEELZEBUB, PRINCE OF DARKNESS, LORD OF THE FLIES,
ETC., ETC.
 Your plan to take over and rule the earth is proceeding smoothly. The
movie, "End of Days", has been released and in it you appear so inept and
lame-brained that mankind will be lulled into a state of inertia upon your
return.
 To review: A while back I possessed the soul - what little of it there was
- of an executive at Universal Pictures and green-lighted a preposterous
and silly screenplay entitled "End of Days."
 As you know, it's the story of your return to Earth at the millennium to
sire a child and thus begin your reign of darkness. Why you must impregnate
a woman is never really made clear, but at least it gives us some
opportunities to show some female skin, thus assuring us the young male
audience.
 To further our endeavor we lured Arnold Schwarzenegger back to the screen
to play your adversary, a former cop turned security specialist named
Jericho Cane.
 Casting him was a God send, if you'll pardon my expression.
 What better way to prove your vulnerability than by having the stuffings
beaten out of you by the wooden Schwarzenegger. Forget that he can't act or
that his emotional range is a wide as a matchstick. He knows how to handle
firearms (throughout, he continually shoots you with an arsenal of useless
weaponry), can throw a punch and can also take a lickin' and keep on
tickin'. (Sorry, boss, since I've lived among the humans I've become
addicted to their television.)
 Plus, we had the screenwriter, one Andrew W. Marlowe, throw in so many
obstacles and conditions that it makes it almost a certainty that you will
fail.
 For example, you have to impregnate the young woman while in human form
and must do so between 11 p.m. and midnight on Dec. 31.
 Of course, this is all piffle and nonsense, but it gives old Arnie a
fighting chance to stop you - as if he could in real life. (Boss, you'll
love the scene in which an old lady almost beats Cane to a pulp.)
 And just to try stirring up some controversy for the film, we've
incorporated a fanatical set of gun-toting, knife-wielding priests whose
mission is to kill the girl before you can get your hands on her. If the
church got honked off about "Dogma", this one will drive them over the top.
 And the scene of Schwarzenegger as a Christ figure crucified to the side
of a building will surely make those do-gooders foam at the mouth.
 Oh evil one, I wouldn't lie (not to you, at least), but "End of Days" is
so bad that it is almost comical.
 To ensure that it is not taken seriously, I hired Rod Steiger, the king of
overacting, for the pivotal role of a priest. Of course, he did just as
expected. You could smell the bacon when he was on the set.
 Also, we cast Gabriel Byrne, a decent actor, but not particularly a
charismatic or good-looking guy to play you. No offense, sire, but the idea
wouldn't work if we cast some hunk like Brad Pitt or Edward Norton as
Satan. What young woman wouldn't want to bed down with either of them?
 As they say out here, the movie will do boffo at the box office - at least
for a week or two, just long enough to lull people into complacency for
your real return.
 My only regret, chief, is that we didn't plan for a sequel. But, who's
going to need one when, right? To paraphrase a pop cult line from an
earlier Schwarzenegger movie, "You'll be back."
 P.S. Pardon my presumption, sire, but I just had a devilishly brilliant
idea. Delay your takeover until we get the grosses. If "End of Day" does
well, it will revitalize Schwarzenegger's career - and that will be hell on
earth.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Brandon Herring
WARNING: May contain slight mild spoilers. 
Rated: R for intense violence/gore, some strong sexuality and language. 
Starring: Arnold Schwarzeneggar, Robin Tunney, Rod Stieger, Gabriel Byrne. 
We go into a movie theater, boom! the lights go down, our hearts race, we go
through ten minutes of preview and finally the movie we've been waiting to see
for a long time comes on. We sit there, watch in disbelief that this movie is
as bad as it is. Why shouldn't I have know what I was getting myself into.
Again like this past summers hit "Stigmata", "End of Days" may be worse. It's
not like this is any kind of original idea, it just throws in some "Rosemary's
Baby", along with "The Devil's Advocate" a little "Exorcist" and some
"Stigmata" here and there. Whala you have "End of Days" a movie that is
extremely disappointing and by the previews made it look terrific. Sadly but
truly again like most recent films, all the good parts are in the trailers. 
The plot which is very confusing at times is also very ludicrous and the movie
is destined to be a hit in the first weekend, and flop in the next. Jericho
Cane (Arnold Schwarzneggar in hit typical macho role) is a cop who finds out
that he is chosen to track down Satan (Living in Gabriel Byrnes body) and stop
him from impregnating Christine York (Robin Tunney) because if he does, and she
gives birth all existence as we know it will cease to exist. He has to do this
before it turns into the year 2000, and strangely he's trying to fight him 5
minutes before 2000 comes. He seeks help from the Catholic church and help from
Rod Stieger (in a terrific role) and tries to save this girl leading to an
ending that's satisfying, but turns into a typical action movie. That's pretty
much it on plot. It does have the razzle and dazzle of a great action movie,
and with the 100m dollar budget parts seem to show it, parts you have to wonder
where all the money went. 
As for Arnie? Good role, OK performance. I think since he is getting a little
older he is held back a lot of his stunts. The thing that disappointed me was
the fact that there was nothing to the film. In the trailers it looks like a
good scary, action film and ends up being a boring, long and preposterous drama
that leads into something else that leaves us with questions. Gabriel Byrnes
(who ironically played a priest in "Stigmata") here plays Satan and gives a
good performance but again seems held back and not into his character. Two
years back Al Pacino gave a terrific performance in the fun "The Devil's
Advocate" and here it seems like the idea of him is in the character also.
Robin Tunney (great performance as always) plays Satan's main person whom he
wants to impregnate to carry his child. Of course Rod Stieger gives another
great performance which really isn't nothing new. 
The direction by Peter Hyams is at times a bit overblown, though not nearly as
the visual style was in "Stigmata". Here we are given great camera work, and
some great scenes that are terrifically directed but sadly just don't work in
this movie. The script written by Andrew Marlowe has a few witty lines, but
again the movie is all style and no substance and by the ending finale climax I
was ready to go home. Only a few things work here and those are a few of the
performances, the writing and visual style, but the storyline and the finished
product don't work as well. 
The sad thing is that "End of Days" had so many things going for it. The plot
could have been more organized, the action scenes could have been more brainy
and less mind-numbing. At times it seems like "Armageddon" and started to get
old and tiresome. Hollywood is running out of ideas bad, and like I've always
said before needs new ones. Even with its 100m budget "End of Days" is less
than pleasing. In fact the 100m dollar budget is at least 30m over, and easily
could have had a 70m budget. 
Maybe I sound crazy, but I am really looking forward to the new Exorcist film,
and hope that they make it as good as the original. We need to get new ideas
and stop recycling old ones just to make money at the box-office. We need to
get more films like "The Blair Witch Project" that could scare people to death,
while people thinking well what exactly is scaring them and how do I know that
it is in fact The Blair Witch. Overblown effects, stupid and thin plot-line,
good performances, disappointing....umm yup those pretty much describe "End of
Days". 
Reviewed by Brandon Herring November 23, 1999. 
Brandon Herring
Http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
Christopher Null
     Here it is, November of 1999, and I thought we weren't going to get
a good end-of-the-world, Satan-conquers-all apocalypse movie (DOGMA
doesn't count).  Whew!  END OF DAYS arrives just in time (no pun
intended) to quench that Linda Blair thirst.
     If you know the basic plot of END OF DAYS (`Satan visits New York
in search of a bride') the question you'll be asking isn't, `Is this a
bad movie?'  Rather, it will probably be, `How bad can it be?'
     Pretty bad.  But for camp value, you aren't going to find a better
bang for the buck than END OF DAYS.  Imagine audiences rolling in the
aisles, talking back to the screen, cracking jokes:  You aren't far from
reality.
     Arnold Schwarzenegger, whose last bad movie was BATMAN & ROBIN,
really tries to show off his recent acting lessons as a deeply troubled
security guard (inexplicably hired to guard the invulnerable devil
himself).  Sidekick Pollack serves up the comic relief, and Robin Tunney
is proving herself to be a solid Designated Emotionally Scarred Damsel
in Distress in all manner of films, working here as the bride-to-be of
good old Lucifer.
     Gabriel Byrne makes as bad (and by that, I mean good -- I think) a
Satan as you're likely to see on film, but it's the groaner of a story
line that will really grab you.  To wit: Arnold's ex-cop does some
offhanded detective work that would put Sherlock Holmes to shame.  His
hunches are so uncanny... it's almost like... *he's working from a
script!*  The religious backstory, featuring Rod Steiger as a Catholic
priest, is so hokey you'll get dizzy from rolling your eyes.  The Y2K
stuff is predictable and, of course, played to the hilt.
     I'm not predicting any Oscars, but I have to say this is one bad
movie that's at least worth one of its two hours on comedic value
alone.  Just remember to say your prayers, kids.
Director: Peter Hyams
Producer: Armyan Bernstein, Bill Borden
Writer: Andrew W. Marlowe
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin
Pollak, Renee Olstead, Matt Gallini, Linda Pine, Rod Steiger, Miriam
Margolyes
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
END OF DAYS
(Universal/Beacon)
Starring:  Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Kevin Pollak, Robin
Tunney, Rod Steiger, CCH Pounder, Miriam Margolyes.
Screenplay:  Andrew W. Marlowe.
Producers:  Armyan Bernstein and Bill Borden.
Director:  Peter Hyams.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, nudity, sexual situations, adult
themes).
Running Time:  118 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     For about ten seconds, there is the faint hope that END OF DAYS is
clued in to its own absurdity. Our hero, Jericho Cane (Arnold
Schwarzenegger), finds himself in the basement of a New York City Catholic
church, protecting a woman named Christine York (Robin Tunney) and
learning a lesson in the apocalypse from a priest (Rod Steiger). It seems
that the Evil One has taken human form (Gabriel Byrne), and plans to bring
about the end of days by impregnating Christine with his child. In order
for the anti-Christ incarnation to "take," according to the priest, said
consummation must occur between 11 p.m. and midnight on December 31, 1999.
Incredulously, Jericho asks the priest, "Is that Eastern Time?"
     It's a nice line, and it couldn't come at a more crucial time. For
over an hour, END OF DAYS fairly drowns in preposterousness. It's the kind
of film where a suspect is found carrying a matchbook that leads Jericho
directly to important clues, and where the same suspect also has something
Jericho cleverly intuits is Christine's name carved into his stomach. It's
the kind of film where Jericho locates Christine by searching though New
York City driver's license records, apparently finding only one Christine
York in a city of 10 million people. It's the kind of film where Jericho
grabs a single book off a shelf, and miraculously finds a clue to a
mysterious pendant he has obtained. And it's the kind of film where, while
being pursued by Satan himself, Christine stops to grab her coat on the
way out the door. After sixty minutes of painful head smacking, I was
ready for that glimmer of hope. Maybe, just maybe, it was time to start
having some fun with the end of the world as we know it.
     This, however, is a supernatural thriller that takes itself far too
seriously. Much of that seriousness revolves around Schwarzenegger, who
plays an ex-cop-turned-private security professional, wallowing in
alcoholism and self-pity after the death of his wife and daughter (for
which he had some indirect responsibility). One assumes this is meant to
be a chance for Schwarzenegger to stretch his serious actor muscles in a
plot line ready-made for a little redemption (Christine owns a music box
just like his daughter had, in case the surrogate daughter angle was too
obscure for you). But Arnold plays tormented as just plain mad, and the
moment when he reaches divine understanding of how he can defeat the Dark
Angel is brutally, unintentionally hysterical. Turning END OF DAYS into a
character piece is a mistake; letting Schwarzenegger play that character
is flat-out foolish.
     It probably seemed like a good idea at the time, since there's also
plenty of gun-firin', helicopter-danglin', subway car-explodin' action.
Some of it is even pretty lively, including the early chase sequence in
which a suspended Schwarzenegger pursues a sniper over a rooftop. Peter
Hyams is a true hack-tion director, and he usually knows how to keep a
film moving along with fireballs a-plenty and several kajillion rounds of
ammunition fired off. There's also quite a bit of unpleasant brutality in
the form of snapped necks, severed jugular veins and punched-out vital
organs. It's not that you expect Satan to be a nice guy -- indeed, Gabriel
Byrne plays him effectively as a smug libertine with a _very_ short temper
-- but that it's hard to settle in and enjoy END OF DAYS as an adventure
thriller when so much is treated as grim and portentous.
     And that's really the fatal flaw of END OF DAYS: it never decides on
an appropriate tone. If we're expected simply to enjoy the carnage, it's
foolish to make the hero a lost soul. If we're expected to take the dark
scenario seriously, the ridiculous plot contrivances make that impossible.
If we're expected to be genuinely scared, the comic relief is a cheat
(though sidekick Kevin Pollak gets one killer line after the ubiquitous
cat-jumping-out-of-nowhere). END OF DAYS could have been effective either
as a genre goof or as edgy SEVEN-esque millennial creep show. Instead,
it's a murky dud that tries to chuckle its way out of the corner it writes
itself into. 

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
On one side, there's Satan himself, still trying to murder the world, and on
the other there's an unbeliever, who just happens to be the only one with
half a chance to save that world. We've seen the story again and again and
again, and the creators of End of Days had to be aware of this. So, they
improvised, first with timing, (millennium fears etc) second with big-name
stars, (Schwarzenegger, Byrne, Steiger), and third with attempting to co-opt
the religious thriller into the high-action genre, which--as one doesn't
require guns to save the day and the other does--doesn't work very well, or,
results in the hero, 'Jericho Cane,' (Schwarzenegger, yes) having to tell
the devil (Gabriel Byrne, in an evil Christopher Walkenish role) to 'go to
hell.' Not the most original line, but then fending off the apocalypse with
hot lead is hard work, and perhaps all the creative effort went into the old
testament pyrotechnics instead of the writing anyway.
Aside from all the divine firepower, though, End of Days does try to be
different in another way, by playing particularly fast and loose with
Revelations, biblical prophecy, all that, mixing it up until existence as we
know it depends upon the devil not jumping in the sack with one Christine
York (Robin Tunney). Most near-apocalyptic movies concern themselves either
with the birth or the rise of the Antichrist or some Antichrist-figure; End
of Days, instead of organizing itself around efforts to prevent that birth
and/or rise, concerns itself with preventing the initial conception. And of
course Christine York doesn't really want to play Vanessa Williams to
Schwarzenegger's Eraser, but neither does she want to have sex with the
devil. Which means that for most of the movie, they're two scant steps ahead
of perdition, running both from Satan and from the Catholic church. It makes
for some high-action, Terminator II kind of stuff, except now the T1000 is
supernatural. In all the other aspects, though, it matches up, even the end.
What End of Days has going for it finally is A) Byrne; B) Kevin Pollak and
his complement of "It's official: I'm never sleeping again" lines; and C)
Schwarzenegger, the original Commando, still playing the Conan we'd pay to
see again and again. What it doesn't have going for it is that for much of
the movie, Jericho thinks he's a burned-out Martin Riggs (Lethal Weapon),
complete with deathwish and all. Too, there's a lot of fumbling over the
whole problem of evil question, which is best left for other movies--say,
Dogma. It does actually have one strong line--about the greatest trick the
devil ever pulled--but perhaps Pollak or Byrne brought that with them from
The Usual Suspects, so it doesn't really count. Of the recent spate of
millennium movies, however, (discounting Entrapment) End of Days is, in
spite of its problems, still miles ahead of Omega Code, and even slightly
better than Stigmata, if only because, where Stigmata seemed to have
preaching on its agenda, all End of Days was after was entertainment, plain
and simple. Good old-fashioned noise and lights, the standard-issue patch
for weak writing. End of Days has nearly a patch a scene.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Author
Donlee Brussel
There are a lot of devil worshippers in New York.  These Satan servants
are everywhere; I'm talking about the psychiatrists, cops, nurses and
hobos.  They're all here to revere Gabriel Byrne in a role Al Pacino
was born to play.  Welcome to Schwarzenegger's long anticipated return
to celluloid, "End of Days."   It's also Arnold's first foray
into "drama" as he plays a suicidal alcoholic bodyguard who's here to
save us all from the devil himself.
In a nutshell, End of Days' plot is simply this: Satan needs to find
the girl he marked as his mate twenty years ago and impregnate her with
the Anti-Christ between 11:00 PM and 12:00 AM, Eastern Standard Time on
December 31, 1999 to initiate the "End of Days."  Only Jericho Cane (Ah-
nuld) can save the world from Lucifer and his flammable urine.  How
will he kill Mephistopheles when he has only ten seconds to nail Robin
Tunney?  Only if you're willing to part with your hard-earned cash will
you find out and I seriously recommend that you don't.
Now some of you may be asking yourselves, "What the hell is Gabriel
doing back in another pisspoor religious movie?"  You'd think after
Stigmata he'd learn to pick better scripts.  Byrne just doesn't have
the intensity to pull this role off.  Pacino had it and used it well in
the guilty pleasure "The Devil's Advocate."  Playing a heavy like the
Prince of Darkness ain't easy, so why didn't casting director Jackie
Burch put as much time into "End of Days" as he did "Lost & Found," "I
Still Know..." and "Judge Dredd?"
Every action film these days requires a sidekick, so why should a
cliché-layered film like this be any different?  They have Kevin
Pollack spewing cheesy one-liners from the "Die Hard" trilogy's cutting
room floor, and according to the audience I was with, they're
hilarious.  I mean come on, lines like those are golden!  In the stark
reality of the world Gabriel Byrne and Kevin Pollack haven't done
anything respectable besides "The Usual Suspects."  That is the only
one good film they starred in, everything on their resumes preceding
and following it are comatose.
It's important to mention Arnold Schwarzenegger's big performance.  Let
me tell you, this guy never has been able to act, he's not acting
in "End of Days" and I truly doubt he'll ever have any talent in
acting.  Maybe, it's in the accent, you know, Arnold's voice just
doesn't seem capable of tugging at my emotions.  He just doesn't have
the skill to do anything properly in a dramatic fashion.  All he can do
is look the role, but looking it just isn't enough nowadays.  There's a
scene in the film where Schwarzenegger's getting his ass whooped by
Miriam Margolyes in an inconceivably hilarious approach that makes me
question whether or not Arnold Schwarzenegger is getting a little weak
around the edges or he just thinks getting a beatdown from a 58 year
old is hilarious.
And of course, let's not forget Peter Hyams, the "acclaimed" director
of "Timecop," "Sudden Death" and "The Relic" doing a pretty sloppy job
of helming this film.  If I were the exec at Universal, I would've
really pushed Sam Raimi to direct this.  In a year of groundbreaking
special effects fests like "Star Wars" and "The Matrix, "Days" looks
incredibly lame.   Those looking to see another Jar Jar Binks
or  "bullet time" will be disappointed.  The $100 million budget used
here was spent on the same old fireballs and explosions we've seen
several times before, directed by a hack with no sense of style or
artistic ability.
"End of Days" is nothing but another scab on everyone involved's
already wounded careers.
